The return of the Czech smoker is approaching.
Pavel Francouz was called up to the NHL
Czech hockey goalkeeper Pavel Francouz, who has been going through a difficult period in his career in recent months, is returning to the NHL.
The 33-year-old native of Plzeň will be on the bench and could soon get into the game.
The former Litvinov, Plzen or Chelyabinsk goaltender was injured in the NHL preseason in October last year.
He played half a game for Vegas and hasn't been on an NHL ice surface since.
The incident occurred as the experienced goalkeeper moved from one post to another.
"Pavel Francouz will be out for approximately three to four weeks with an injury to his lower body," the Denver team announced at the beginning of October.
His return to the NHL has lasted more than two months.
On Sunday morning U.S. time, he was called from a farm where he had caught four ducks and showed his old form.
In the AHL, he stopped 94.5% of the shots he faced.
The Pilsen native wants to finally make it and confirm that he belongs in the best league in the world.
In his senior year, he had problems with his hips and didn't play in the shortened pandemic season.
In the NHL, "Franc" has played 36 games, with a save percentage of 92.3%.
Charles wishes Camilla a Merry Christmas as William and Kate pose in Jordan
Prince William and his wife Kate have chosen a family photograph taken during their trip to Jordan as their Christmas card this year.
Prince Charles also posted a photograph of himself helping his wife, Camilla, into a hat at a race meeting.
The BBC news channel reported the incident on its website.
They send their wishes to friends, colleagues and charities they work with.
The photo was taken somewhere in the desert.
The Duchess of Cambridge is wearing a long summer dress in khaki and so is Princess Charlotte.
Prince William, the Duke of Cambridge, is wearing the same shorts and T-shirt as Princes George and Louis.
Who took the photo and when it was taken is not known, nor is it clear exactly when it was taken.
Last year, the royal family posed for a Christmas card photo in front of a bale of straw at their country estate in Norfolk.
The picture, which will be used as a Christmas card, was also released by the heir to the throne Prince Charles and his wife Camilla.
Photographer Sam Hussein caught them in action at Ascot in June.
Charles, who has a cylinder on his head and a veil on his face, helps Camille put on her colour-coordinated veil.
According to efotbal.cz, Slavia promised Berbatov a million for the title, Tvrdík denied it.
Prague - Investigators in the current corruption case allegedly worked on the assumption that the former vice president of the Czech Football Association, Roman Berbr, had been promised one million crowns by Slavia Prague for winning the league title in the 2018/19 season.
He informed efotbal.cz that he had access to a part of the police records.
The chairman of the Vršovice club, Jaroslav Tvrdík, stated that the blue-and-yellows did not commit any corruption.
The server published a transcript of police wiretaps in which Slavia is mentioned mainly by its former sports director Jan Nezmar, who left the club last summer.
According to the indictment, a former influential Red and White official was in frequent contact with Berba and with former sports director Roman Rogoz, who is also among the accused in the case.
Police reportedly worked with information that Slavia promised Berbatov a financial reward if he won the title.
In 2019, the SK Slavia Praha team won the first league title.
The police body had knowledge that Roman (Berbr) was promised a million-dollar payment by the SK Slavia Praha functionaries, the server quoted from the document.
The next day, according to the police, Berbr met not only with Nezmar, but also with the president of the board of directors of Slavia, Tvrdík.
According to the server, it is not clear whether the police are still investigating this information.
The defendant denied any corrupt conduct.
Between 2015 and 2017, we actively tried to change the situation in Czech football and offered an alternative to its development.
We have never done anything illegal, we have never tried to influence referees in contravention of the rules of fair play and we have never provided any financial benefits in this regard," Tvrdík told Seznam Zprávy.
In the recordings, Nezmar, among other things, indiscriminately insults some former Slavia players of dark skin and also denigrates his former boss Tvrdík.
The match-fixing case was sparked last October by a police raid on several locations, including the Prague headquarters of the FAČR.
The highest-ranking person in the affair is Berbr, who no longer figures in any of the football functions.
In mid-January, he was released from custody along with the former sports director of Vyšehrad, Rogoz.
Helicopters, tanks and bvp are cold war larping.
They will be new, but basically worse (the crew will have to leave the armoured cabin and carry ammunition by hand without cover).
The cars - Toyota HiLux - are new and good
The armoured vehicles and various armoured vehicles - at a decent level, in addition, it has been possible to get rid of the Praga V3S even in specialised units.
Aircraft: combat-capable but at the end of its life, transport-wise too small with a short range, but modern.
Drones - few and only small types with no combat potential
Missiles - we have none (but we are producing and exporting)
PVO: medium - undergraduate, obsolete; short-range - good, modern, relatively good number.
I have that story.
There's a herd of bison just outside of town.
They were coming down the river and doing damage to the crops, so I was sitting there.
When I arrived, I saw a fisherman on the other side of the river.
I didn't want to make a scene, so I just sat there and he didn't notice me.
I hoped she would leave before anything happened, but of course, a fox came along.
I let her get within 40 metres before I decided to shoot.
The poor fisherman nearly shit himself, he was waving his head all over the place, so I called him a fox.
When I got off the bus, I was furious.
In other words, a meadow can be a prairie.
On the other hand, it's not a war, it would have to be a lot of coincidences for anything to happen, you'd probably be seen on a thermal camera by now, almost everyone has one.
So, in a visible place, expensive things to put under your feet and you should be fine.
Vojtech versus Hamáček.
The Ministry of Health has bought respirators at a much lower price than the Ministry of Health
The state agency responsible for purchasing and distributing masks, gowns and respirators for the professions most closely affected by the coronavirus has spent millions of crowns in recent weeks to procure them.
iRozhlas compared the purchases of individual ministries and found that the amounts varied by hundreds of crowns in a single day.
Why did prices move so dramatically?
Which agencies acted economically?
And why did other people buy tracksuits?
Lenka Kabrhelová talks to the editor of the iRozhlas server, Dominika Kubištová.
I respect the soldiers and the army (I am not affected by memories of the CSSR that older generations went through), but the Czech Republic cannot benefit from compulsory military service.
We don't even have big stores of technology that could be used by the reservists, we don't even have modern technology for the current professionals, and moreover, modern technology is getting more and more complex, so the skills of the reservists will be rapidly lost over time.
Modern conventional conflicts, which anyone can get involved in, will happen very quickly. There will be no time to retrain.
And finally, reserve forces/territorial defense are of great importance for countries like Ukraine, where it is necessary to wage a large-scale guerrilla war and it is also a stated necessity to repel the enemy.
In the territory of the Czech Republic, only a conflict of such magnitude and intensity will be fought, where guerrilla warfare will be irrelevant, and we do not have the appropriate geography.
We don't have individual skills.
It's not even the worst.
The worst is that half of them play like they've got one.
Then you get situations where you see a guy who 2 minutes ago missed a wide open net, goes on a 2-on-1 or even 3-on-1 rush and you're like "what the hell is he thinking right now?"
Of course, he will be taken away by the average tax payer.
The situation with this player "distracting the defender" is so bad that I'm surprised to see our attacker manage to draw one of the opponent's players.
First stars
The Covid-19 pandemic is slowing, but experts are not expecting any major changes in the coming weeks.
Hospitalizations, according to statistical models, will persist for some time, and the pandemic equation has added a new unknown: the omicron variant, which is very likely to spread faster than the current dominant Delta.
At the same time, it is not possible to say with absolute certainty whether it can cause a more serious course, how much it is helped by vaccination or post-infection immunity acquired before the disease.
But this week has also seen an unexpected phenomenon on the plus side of the Covid equation: the possibility of treatment.
A new drug, molnupiravir, has arrived in the Czech Republic, which reduces the risk of severe disease and hospitalisation by a third and can be taken at home.
It will also soon be joined by Pfizer's paxlovid, which has a success rate of 85 per cent in early trials.
The first deliveries of molnupiravir to the Czech Republic, however, have not only raised hopes of expanding the portfolio of tools useful in the fight against the coronavirus pandemic, but have also highlighted the question of how the country's administration is prepared for the arrival of the drugs.
As stated, the first to get molnupiravir to domestic patients will be Merck.
The company ended up on the tape first and foremost because the drug was developed long before the outbreak of the current pandemic in order to find a suitable treatment for viral diseases in horses in South America.
This research is often overlooked that people in the West (Germany, Sweden, etc.)
They are generally less open and less willing to share their views.
On the other hand, Eastern Europeans, and especially Czechs, are used to saying "as our beak grew."
You can do a survey where you ask people if they like Muslims.
Most Czechs will tell you that they don't.
In the West, they will tell you that they love migration, that they should all help and that we Czechs are racist bastards.
And then they go and vote for parties like AfD.
They are afraid of cancel culture, saying this in public means losing a job and a media lynching.
Then, in surveys, it looks good in the west, bad in the east.
But they will find out what people think.
Only in France, Le Pen and Zemmour, both over 20%.
We even know that the objects are three and completely identical.
Identical because of the unit turn, so that the soldiers don't have to relearn where everything is, all the objects are the same.
One is the Atom Museum Brdy and the other two are abandoned.
The funny thing is that the SSBNs didn't want to have nuclear warheads on their own territory either for safety or deployment reasons and because of their more western location.
Only the heads of the rockets were stored in the underground bunkers, not the whole rockets as they say.
If the weapon was needed, a special unit would have been called in to retrieve the head and mount it on some sort of carriage.
In addition, the remaining ones are in a deplorable state.
In secondary school, we had a classmate Cigán, we were together for four years.
He was pretty good, he did some good impressions, sometimes he was a bit over the top, but he was our mascot.
He was liked by everyone, he often came in and wanted to explain things, he was late a lot, he came in regularly, he did sport with us, he didn't steal food, he didn't steal phones, he came in clean.
He went to school in the woods, did a lot of monkeying around, but he was a good kid, never got in trouble.
In the eighth or ninth grade, the cousins, the gypsies, were in the same class.
Soon after, the teacher was beaten up, the police were called often, they threatened and harassed the other students.
I personally sell things from time to time (old things, things I don't need, etc.) and I have sold to the Gypsies many times, they always had money, they didn't try to make any attempts to bargain down the price, the communication was calm.
I even sold a car to a guy who called me a month later and said he changed his mind.
I myself say that I am not a racist, it doesn't matter if someone is white, black, yellow, blue or any other, as long as he behaves like a decent person (works, functions, doesn't beat women, just normal behavior).
But whoever comes along, they stretch out their hand, they evict people and houses, and there's just a mess everywhere, and they're causing problems... so it doesn't matter what colour they are, it's going to bother me.
I have no problem with African migrants if they come here and start working, they learn the language (not necessarily, at least English), they respect our culture.
If you believe in Allah, it doesn't matter to me as long as you respect my traditions and culture, I will respect yours.
Young woman died in a car accident in Prachatice
"The young woman suffered severe multiple injuries and, despite resuscitation efforts, sadly died at the scene of her injuries," said a spokeswoman for the South Bohemian Ambulance Service, Zuzana Fajtlová.
The crash was probably caused by the driver who took the girl.
The 18-year-old driver of a Peugeot car was probably travelling from the village of Žíchovec to the village of Bavorov and for unknown reasons swerved into the opposite lane in a bend.
The Peugeot ended up on the roof of the road after the collision with the Skoda Octavia, police spokeswoman Štěpánka Schwarzová described the accident.
The young driver of the Peugeot suffered very serious injuries in the accident.
He suffered multiple injuries and was trapped in the car.
After his rescue, he was provided with emergency pre-hospital care and was airlifted to a hospital in České Budějovice in a stable condition, the rescue worker Fajtlová stated.
She added that the man from the second car suffered minor injuries to his chest and was taken to hospital.
New rules apply to parcels from countries outside the EU, customers often fail to provide information
Lukáš Neuheisl orders from abroad several times a month.
He mainly collects cards.
"It's usually tens of dollars, say from ten dollars up, where it's worth importing, especially from Japan, where the post is often free," the collector explains.
Since October, ordering small parcels has become more expensive, and the post office now has to provide customs data.
He'll get an e-mail saying customs are expecting the package.
Then all you have to do is fill in the details of the consignor, and if the trader has not already charged VAT on the sale, the customs authority will deduct the VAT from the total amount for the consignment and the transport.
If the addressee does not arrange customs clearance himself, the total amount must also include the carrier's fee.
According to Lukáš Neuheisl, however, the whole process is not complicated.
I click one or two delete buttons, drop in two attachments, and I'm done.
For me, it's mostly a five-minute question, says Neuheisl.
However, not all deliveries go smoothly.
Due to new customs regulations, the daily number of international parcels received at Prague's international post office has fallen from 60,000 to 15,000.
In addition, according to Česká pošta, another problem is that people do not respond to requests for information needed to complete customs procedures.
Currently, there are 30,000 parcels in the international post that we have to process.
If people filled in all the information that is required and filled it in on time, we would be about halfway there, says Matěj Vít of the Czech Post.
Inflation solution
See the titles to see how you would propose to deal with current inflation.
Currently, inflation is at 9.9% and is expected to rise further.
What should the state do, in your opinion, to slow down or compensate for this growth?
We see, for example, in Poland, a reduction in VAT on food and PHM, is this the way forward for you?
What do you think will happen that is inevitable with this going?
Prices are rising faster than wages, and I think it's inevitable that people won't be able to afford normal things, like energy.
How many did you get, for example, added (who is an employee)?
This year, I got a 2% raise, which is insulting, but fortunately, I make the same amount of money running my business while I'm employed.
Can someone explain to me why convicted rapists are sent to prison for just 6 months?
This just doesn't make sense to me, how a court can sentence an animal to just 6 months in jail just to do it all over again as soon as it gets out.
Six months is nothing compared to the trauma a victim will carry for years, negatively affecting their sexual relationships and relationships in general.
And that's not to mention the fact that the victim of the rape may never recover from that.
Will this dissuade potential future rape victims from coming forward?
Man from Hrob "fired" his girlfriend from Kostomlat
The man from the Graveyard inadvertently helped the officers secure his nationally-wanted girlfriend from Kostomlat, who was wanted on an arrest warrant.
He called her himself.
But he went about it the wrong way.
First, he flagged down a passerby and came up with a story about being robbed.
Officers responding to the 911 call arrived at the scene and didn't laugh when the alleged "victim" told them he made it all up to get officers to the scene.
In fact, he only wanted to ask the guards how to report to the Czech Police.
Officers then checked the man's identity and found that the woman was on the national wanted list and had a warrant for her arrest.
The case is being handled by the PČR.
Honest question for people here, do you consider our country to be Slavic?
Personally, I think we're no longer ethnically or culturally Slavic, but I'd like to hear your opinion.
Otherwise, of course, I agree with the meme - it's a shame that Churchill didn't manage to secure the liberation of Prague.
Of course, I do not deny that we have a Slavic language.
I don't know, it's a bit of a leap of faith for a rational person to believe in something just because it might potentially benefit them.
I would not personally consider such a case to be true faith.
I cannot agree with Pascal, there are at least ten thousand different religions in the world, if not more.
Which god or gods does one then choose?
I would say it's pretty likely that at least one of the thousands of religions out there has at least one god who will punish you if you believe in a different god.
But even in the 10th verse, it says that there is no other god but Jahve.
So wouldn't it be more rational to stick with believing in any god, rather than risk picking the wrong one out of thousands, and having that one true god send me to hell or some such place?
Others: Voluntary training followed by entry into the reserve.
The Swiss model is similar.
X months of training (in different specializations, X months for one) and under the supervision of professionals with practical experience.
If you do well, you can get a professional offer.
All of the AČR's components would benefit from something like this.
It could be done in cooperation with the Defense University.
We can say this: The education sector and industry are constantly collaborating, firms are recruiting in schools and there is a kind of cross-fertilisation as the workforce migrates from educational institutions into employment.
Not just in adolescence, but this process is ongoing, we are constantly learning new things, moving from one field to another, etc.
Similar cross-fertilization should also take place between the civilian and military sectors.
I see it as a way to build a relationship between the citizen and the army, which is an institution that guarantees that Russia, Germany or the Mongol horde will never invade again.
It's funny how you think of NATO as something carved in stone, we have allies and they will defend us if push comes to shove.
Well, good luck.
One election in the US that turns their budget and NATO goes down the tubes.
The Brits will trade us for Russian rubles, the Germans will trade us for Russian gas, and the Poles have already shown that all they need to do is show their backs and take what they want.
The only thing that has consistently worked as a guarantee of independence is an army and a populace that can operate the military technology of its day.
And today, any teenager can fly a remote-controlled device, so what's the problem?
We don't need border defences, they're a thing of the past, but a bored teenager with a remote-controlled device will do just fine.
How to avoid a box tsunami
You unwrap the presents under the Christmas tree and suddenly you have a house full of boxes and wrapping paper?
This "waste" is again being used by e-shops, which lack packaging materials.
That's why there's a map of businesses that accept your used boxes.
And not just at Christmas.
All packaging materials are designed to withstand repeated handling.
That is why it is a pity to treat them as single-use items.
Anyone can bring a cardboard box, plastic or paper filler to a participating business (there are nearly 150 of them listed on the KAMsNIM.cz map).
This will support small businesses, reduce the amount of waste created and also avoid the overfilled blue bins.
The shops themselves are welcoming the packaging shortage and the saved money, as the packaging cardboard has increased by 50% in the last period.
In addition, I am strengthening my brand by appealing to environmentally-conscious customers.
One such company is TIERRA VERDE, a producer of eco-friendly cosmetics and eco-friendly toiletries.
Boxes and filling materials are delivered to Popůvky in Brno by individuals who collect them at home, but we also receive calls from companies with which we have arranged regular deliveries of used cardboard.
We will use this to package our e-shop's deliveries.
Individually and as a company, we are creating a more considerate world.
Our wish is to preserve the resources and beauty of nature for future generations, says Petra Lopušníková from Tierry.
However, the www.KAMsNIM.cz application does not only show collection points for packaging material.
It's a search engine if you need to get rid of anything (where to take sorted household waste, where to drop off out-of-date medicines, tyres, worn-out electrical goods, batteries, light bulbs, bulky waste, etc.).
All the waste can then go to the right place, and second-hand items will find their second home.
The map of the project contains more than 100,000 such places.
"More and more collection points, re-use centres, textile containers, food banks, charity shops, SWAPs and other places that help find a use for things that would otherwise become waste are being added," says Miroslav Kubásek, one of the app's authors from the Clean up the Czech Republic association.
I think it's a shame that, in this day and age, technology is so simple and idiot-proof that kids who use a computer or a phone play games, but they don't learn the basic computer skills.
Recently there has been a problem (mainly in English articles) that university students do not understand the principle of components on a computer.
Because, for example, Google Photos or Apple's photo apps or even mobile phones in general just hide the underlying filesystem with folders and everything is put on one screen in the app.
Feel free to use the technique from a young age, but above all, let them learn something.
Rewrite history, seriously
Emmanuel Macron presented the priorities of the French EU presidency - starting in January - and it was a big deal.
Macron spoke for more than an hour, during which he unveiled the logo of the presidency, called for the protection of Europeans - at work and on the street - and mentioned so many actions that it will not be possible to carry them out in half a year.
French politicians are fond of it and so are the voters.
Macron's supporters on the right and left agree on one thing: Europe.
And in France, there will be new presidential elections in April.
The election calendar has also affected priorities.
The French leader mentioned that historians should write "one history of Europe" and France is ready to provide the conditions for such a history to be written by historians.
Several commentators have already criticized Macron for what they see as pro-European propaganda and rewriting history.
In fact, they are trying to rewrite history.
The far-right candidate for the French presidency, Éric Zemmour, is currently touring France with the claim that the Vichy regime, which collaborated with Hitler during World War II, was not so bad, and is having some success with French voters.
Let us take Macron's idea of a single history textbook seriously and not pay attention to what is happening in France.
Wouldn't it be necessary?
Students in European countries are taught history as a story of us versus them and never as a story of the whole.
The Spaniards, the French, the Czechs learn who defeated whom in which battle.
But if they don't have a enlightened rabbi, they won't know the wider context of the event.
Quo Vadis, Aida? is the film of the year.
The Czech "Mice" did not win.
The story, which returns to the Srebrenica massacre of 1995, also won awards for Best Director and Best Actress for Jasna Duričić.
He was at the top of the audience rankings at this year's Karlovy Vary Festival.
The best actor award went to Anthony Hopkins for The Father in Berlin.
I'm not very young, I'm not very healthy/fit, and I'm not vaccinated.
It was like having the flu/being sick for a couple of days, I didn't feel like smoking...
It was worse than the common flu.
I don't have diarrhea with the flu.
(Just my personal experience. I don't say that everyone is like this)
Christmas book recommendations
The Christmas double issue, out on 20 December, will include a traditional literary supplement.
And along with it, cultural tips.
We are also sending you a copy of this digital edition, which you can give as a Christmas present if you have the time.
The prose texts follow the previous similar collection Petříček Sellier & Petříček Bellot.
Another dose of observing the world and describing everyday things with a heightened poetic sensibility, depth and atmosphere.
In his second prose, photographer Šesták tried to capture the essence of the small town and Czech society.
A story of returning to one's roots that turns out to be just an illusion.
The feminist and comparative historian turns the story of Little Red Riding Hood into a tale for the present-day village.
Its brutality surpasses the folk version and escalates into a horror of emotional emptiness.
And that the path back to instinct is shorter than we're willing to admit
In his penultimate novel, he tells a much less sentimental story of homecoming than we've come to expect.
Those who stayed and those who left know too little about each other to make a marriage work.
Trains start running according to the new timetable, some of the operators will change
From Sunday, trains will start running according to the new timetable on the railway.
The biggest change is the replacement of the operators on some routes, for example between Ústí nad Labem and Kolín, where instead of ČD, RegioJet will start operating.
For most lines, only the departure time is changed, and sometimes the route as well.
There will also be dozens of new trains on the tracks.
The transport companies started selling the tickets already in the autumn.
České dráhy plan to run an average of 6783 passenger trains per day on the new timetable, of which an average of 478 will be long-distance trains.
The trains will travel approximately 118 million kilometres under the new timetable.
The tracks will also run to Germany, Poland, Slovakia, Hungary, Austria and Switzerland.
The company is introducing dozens of new trains as part of the new timetable.
The main novelty will be InterJet trains running on the Prague - Cheb route.
The new trains of the transport company will run in northern Moravia or in western Bohemia.
The transport company will also increase fares from next year by an average of 3.2 percent.
Railways take inflation into account in their tariffs every year.
The biggest change in the RegioJet timetable is the introduction of the R23 Ústí nad Labem – Mělník – Nymburk – Kolín line.
The operator will replace České dráhy following the Ministry of Transport's tender.
RegioJet will run 16 trips per day, eight in each direction.
Other changes will affect long-distance connections between Prague and Brno, which will also stop at Havlíčkův Brod, Žďár nad Sázavou and Kolín from Sunday.
Leo Express will keep its 16 departures, two return trips to Slovakia and also the weekend connection to Krakow.
According to Emil Sedlářík, the carrier tried to maintain as similar as possible the travel times of its long-distance trains despite the planned shutdowns.
There should be no major disruption to Arriva and other train operators' services.
The driver will also change on some regional routes.
Travellers can expect changes, for example in Českolipsko, where the route from Mladá Boleslav via Česká Lípa to Rumburk will no longer be served by České dráhy, but by the Trilex trains of the German company Die Länderbahn.
Passengers will also be able to use the single fare on the railway for a second year.
Like Czech Railways, its price will increase by 3.2 percent due to inflation.
I disagree.
Do we not learn from the other side?
Everywhere we hear how much they fought for their rights, how they were oppressed and had to act, how they died.
I've never heard a defense of slavery from the pro-slavery side or from anyone who doesn't condemn it.
Nobody tells you in school that black people often sold black people into slavery and that they were often the worst slave owners.
No one teaches you in school that colonists often bought land from the Indians, and all you hear is how brutally we Europeans slaughtered them, while they slaughtered each other.
I have also spent some time in the United States, in schools both in the north and in the south.
I haven't met anyone who has deliberately covered up facts, but I've heard about it before and I think it's a problem, I don't deny that (for example, in Japan, WW2 war crimes are very much taboo).
My point was more that history is not black and white and that we tend to look at it from a modern perspective without understanding.
History doesn't care about your feelings, it's just what it is and I think it's a fatal error to judge without looking at things in their time.
On the other hand, we should learn from this and not do it again.
By the way, while we're on the subject of the Southern states, yes, the Confederate flag and the famous slave owners are quite popular down there, but they've had some pretty good successes and I find it absurd to dismiss them.
And the North wasn't much better than it is today, as a lot of people idealize it.
And a lot of people forget that not everyone in the South was a slave owner and a lot of things were against them.
I would not compare this with Russia, they deliberately omit some facts, lie and manipulate, moreover, our view of them does not exist (there was a video on YouTube from a TV channel where someone was beaten up who started talking about our legionnaires and 1968).
What struck me about the US schools was the rise of Marxism and the idealization of communism, something their country had never experienced.
Overall, I felt that at some universities it was disturbing that the students were so radicalized, and that the schools had supported them so many times.
And when I think of the fact that these people will one day be much older, I feel a bit sick at the thought that this could be the voice of the majority, because among the young, and even in the ruling elite.
I think feminism has already achieved what it set out to achieve a long time ago, and it's no longer about that.
Currently, feminists are those who have nothing to do with it and ignore the basic biological facts, as do other groups such as LGBT, which leads to radicalisation on the other side, often leading to opposition to quite reasonable things.
The more radical someone is, the more they are heard.
At the end of the day, I haven't met anyone who has condemned me for colonialism or slavery.
I guess I met bad geography, but it was mutual :D
Not because I don't like it here, but because it's pointless to me.
I'm proud of something I didn't do myself?
In addition, the concept of nationality in general seems to me to be unnecessary from the point of view of personal identity.
If it's something to do with people, their interests, their views of the world and shared experiences, not the place where we were born.
I'm not a believer, but I can tell you this: We have two Greek Catholic parishes, one Ukrainian and one Slovak.
The Slovak priest is a really nice guy, his sermons are more about theology than politics, but he always manages to throw in a bit about the coronavirus, everyone is embarrassed.
Then there is of course the Czechoslovak Hussite Church.
Officially they are Protestants, but in fact they are born of Catholic modernism and are actually Catholics without a pope.
I know a lot of Catholics who go to Hussite services because it's theologically very similar, but the members are usually more liberal.
They have a beautiful and historically very valuable functionalist church on Botanická Street.
Otherwise, the church of St. Michael on the Dominican Square belongs to the Dominicans and they even hold a mass in Latin every Sunday at 15:00 just as they did before Vatican II.
The Bethlehem star is in the Czech Republic, the scouts took it from Austria
Břeclav - The lit candle in Bethlehem, where according to Christian tradition Jesus Christ was born, is in the Czech Republic.
The scouts didn't go to Vienna this time because of the coronavirus pandemic, but their Austrian colleagues handed him over at the Reintal-Břeclav border crossing in the morning.
They took it from him last year at the border.
The Bethlehem Light is a beautiful Christmas tradition that we participate in every year, and I look forward to it very much.
It is an honour for me to be chosen, said the Girl Scout Amálie Budíková to the present journalists.
Last year, the handover took place at the border crossing Mikulov-Drasenhofen, directly on the border bridge, this year at the border crossing Reintal - Břeclav on the parking lot.
However, he usually takes the train to Vienna.
There is no change in the distribution of the fire across the Czech Republic.
The scouts traditionally take the Bethlehem lights by train to Brno, where they hand them over to the diocesan bishop Vojtěch Cikrle.
On Saturday 18 December, the scouts' couriers will deliver the lights on the selected high-speed trains and on the individual trains.
They will hand over the flame to local scouts or volunteers who will then spread the flame across the Czech Republic, even to places where there are no railways.
This year, the scouts must also follow the current measures to prevent the spread of the coronavirus.
It's the same as last year.
We recommend that courier teams and local event organizers wear masks, try to keep a distance, there should be as few of them as possible, not to sing to colleagues, just to behave in a way that is as safe as possible, said Betlémské světlo spokesperson Zuzana Hrbková.
The tradition of the Bethlehem light, which travels across Europe, was born in 1986 in Austria.
The aim is to spread the idea of peace, friendship and brotherhood along with the flame.
The light of Bethlehem is a symbol of hope, a light that pierces the darkness.
In the Czech Republic, scouts and scouts have been caring for it for more than 30 years.
The action is backed by hundreds of volunteers, and the candles are also a symbol of compassion and human kindness.
All the news, including a list of places where people can get a candle, can be found on the website www.betlemskesvetlo.cz.
I don't have an economics degree, so I don't know the basics of economics that confirm that subsidies are a cancer on the economy, but I don't think that subsidies as a whole would be a problem.
Infrastructure development, ecology (e.g. water retention), health and education will all make good use of the money, but I just don't see why the money should be spent on agriculture, industry and firms in general.
As mentioned - it produces excess product and damages the free market and "natural life of the company."
I work in a factory where there are a million signs saying "xy project funded/co-funded by the xy project" and such a company is just artificially kept alive.
This is not support for a company that employs x people, this is a waste of development where this company hangs on and takes business/employees from firms that could grow and be more productive after its demise
It's a total no-brainer, it's terrifying.
Even someone who was born in the Internet age can get caught up in some trick or trap - especially advertising.
I think online ads don't work on me, but then I catch myself humming the tune the next day - it's just so catchy that you can't help but get caught up in it.
For this reason, I support the radical voices in the European Parliament, which currently want to ban programmatic advertising...
It's all a scam, in a word - I would ban the Internet.
I feel like this virus has roots in (but mostly in point 1):
1. "I won't believe in something that most people believe in and makes sense, I'm not a sheep, I'd rather believe in something that's less likely, it doesn't make sense, but it's important that I have my own original opinion which I'll claim is critical thinking."
2. "I won't believe everything I hear from the media"
3. "I don't trust politicians"
TV is falling out of love with Christmas movies, with 200 premiering this year
Los Angeles - Movie theaters, TV networks and streaming platforms in the United States and other English-speaking countries have fallen out of the Christmas movie trend, and this year they will present their viewers with a record more than 200.
The IMDb movie database calculated it.
The Christmas family and romantic movie genre has been scoring big with audiences in recent years, and has been increasing viewership, so more of these films are being made.
This year, four times as many Christmas films have been made as in 2011 and twice as many as five years ago.
The IMDb database, however, only includes those movies that have the word Christmas in their titles, so the number of holiday films will be much higher.
The movies people traditionally associate with Christmas have been around for a long time.
In the Czech Republic, this period is associated with fairy tales, and globally, films such as Home Alone, Love Actually and the classic 1946 film It's a Wonderful Life are popular.
But the right boom of Christmas pictures started in 2009, when the American cable television network Hallmark launched a special film series, the BBC reported.
Her Christmas project, Countdown to Christmas, then included four films and was a huge success.
This year, the station started its viewers on Christmas on October 22 and will present a total of 42 Christmas pictures.
Lifetime's rival network, Lifetime, has 35 new holiday-themed movies in its lineup this year, and popular streaming platforms like Netflix also contribute to the total.
"In this magical time of the story, it doesn't matter so much, but it's important that there are a lot of Christmas trees in the background and it's snowing," said Brandon Gray, author of the book I'll Be Home for Christmas Movies.
"For the audience, it's a form of escape and a way to feel a little bit of calm in the midst of all the holiday craziness and the insanity of the world we've been living in for the last couple of years," Gray said.
He says, for example, that Hallmark uses the same recipe for its movies, which is uniform but successful.
You have two people who fall in love, but then, about half an hour before the end, some misunderstanding arises, which is, of course, successfully resolved and the two of them fall in love.
It's like that, and as long as all the films look the same and have the same atmosphere, people are going to watch one after another, adds Gray.
Mazepin tested positive for Covid-19 and will not race in the season finale of F1.
Only 19 drivers will line up for the Abu Dhabi Grand Prix in Formula 1.
Nikita Mazepin tested positive for Covid-19 and will not compete in the final race of the season.
Haas sends only one car onto the track.
In the last race of the season he was aiming for a better position than 20th, which he achieved in qualifying.
However, Russian Nikita Mazepin from the Haas team will not take part in the Abu Dhabi Grand Prix.
He had tested positive for Covid-19.
Only 19 cars will start the race, with Mazepin's teammate Mick Schumacher starting from the back of the grid, Max Verstappen starting from pole position, who will go head to head with Lewis Hamilton for the title.
Mazepin is according to Haas's statement relatively okay and doesn't show any signs.
Nikita is physically fine as he was asymptomatic.
He is now in isolation and will follow the advice of public health officials, with safety being the overriding priority for all involved," the Formula 1 representatives said in a statement to formula1.com.
Haas is not sending a replacement driver to the race, nor can it.
A substitute would have to complete a qualification or drive in another part of the weekend.
The first athlete does not have COVID-19.
Kimi Räikkönen, who was just about to finish the season, had covid-19, last year Sergio Pérez and Lewis Hamilton were positively tested.
They can also lock you up for this.
And everyone will be wondering why the boss said that.
In terms of the law, Covid is listed as a contagious disease.
So it's in the same group as HIV, smallpox, yellow fever or typhus.
§ 152 Spreading of infectious diseases
(1) Whoever intentionally causes or increases the risk of the introduction or spread of a contagious disease among humans shall be punished with imprisonment for a term which may extend to three years or with a fine or with both.
(2) The offender will be sentenced to imprisonment for two to eight years.
c) breaches a significant obligation arising from his employment, profession, position or function or imposed on him by law, or
d) causes serious harm to health.
(3) The offender will be sentenced to imprisonment for a term of three to ten years if the act referred to in paragraph 1 results in serious injury to the health of at least two persons or death.
(4) The offender will be sentenced to imprisonment for a term of five to twelve years if the act referred to in paragraph 1 results in the death of at least two persons.
Quiz: Why failing firms often have women at the helm and what your boss should never ask you
The gender pay gap, i.e. the so-called gender pay gap, has been one of the highest in the EU for a long time.
Which country has the biggest differences?
And in what age bracket and in what industry do women earn the least?
Test yourself on what you know about pay inequality.
Gold, silver and 150 diamonds: The price of the most expensive diamond is staggering!
It's a bit like a mobile jeweller's and the maker has put in half a year's work and all his savings into it.
"I had a vision of what I wanted to create, but I didn't have a lot of experience at home with sweatshirts," says Liban, who spent 3,000 hours over six months on his project.
The silk was bought in Italy, the 24-carat gold thread in France and the 2000 Swarovski crystals were supplied by the company.
The silver stars were then adorned with 150 diamonds.
"It's based on silk and cotton, but the silk gives it the elasticity," the designer says, adding that she doesn't recommend washing it.
And it has another trick up its sleeve.
"I'm completely out of money, I have to sell my sweater as soon as possible," admits Liban.
If he succeeds, he will set a world record.
The previous most expensive sweater sold five years ago cost just 720,000 crowns.
If MZ is detached from reality, it doesn't really matter - let it spin off into its own orbit and replace it with a new one.
The fact is that the departure of FB from Europe would very much help its non-Russian parts (which are under Russian influence).
I think it would do a lot to clean up the social climate.
It would also clarify the channels of "brotherly aid from the Soviet Union" to some of our political parties and leaders.
Then people who vote for them should also be more clearly aware of whose interests they actually serve.
Too bad he doesn't own TikTok.
Many growing pains would suddenly find the sun shining outside...
Trump has openly encouraged the abuse of the accused, reaping what he has sown.
On the situation in the United States with the leading African-American reporter.
In the United States, new cases of police brutality are emerging, this time during the nationwide protests.
The protests that followed the killing of George Floyd by a police officer during an arrest have opened a debate on systemic racism, police work and cases of police brutality against black Americans.
Lenka Kabrhelová speaks with one of the leading African-American journalists, The Atlantic reporter Adam Serwer.
But what would that increase in funding?
The EU is pouring money into us in the form of subsidies.
If it stops doing that, we won't have the money.
I really don't see how leaving the Union would stop us using that money for something else...
You can argue that the money from those endowments could be used better, but that's a whole different discussion.
Is it even possible for a business to evade taxes?
Is it possible for a business to evade taxes?
After all, if some piece of meat goes through a veterinary inspection, it must be recorded somewhere, and it can't just disappear, can it?
Prazdroj and Jelínek don't seem to be making special alcohol for the black market.
But they often don't give me a receipt or take it away and throw it away.
The government approved the deployment of up to 150 troops to help Poland.
Drone pilots, explorers and researchers could be on their way before Christmas, with the mission approved for six months.
They are helping their Polish colleagues to protect the border with Belarus and to build the planned fence.
Poland has officially requested NATO assistance in relation to the regime in Belarus, which has been carrying out a series of actions for several months, inviting citizens from the countries of the Middle East to cross its territory with a false promise of an easy crossing of the EU border.
British and Estonian troops are already stationed in Poland.
Is the Omikron mutation spreading in southern Moravia?
Hygiene is investigating another case of a child from Adam's.
"We currently have another suspected case of this variant in another child from Adam's class.
There is no direct contact with previous cases from Adamov school," said Ciupek.
In the past week, six cases have been reported in the county.
"We are still awaiting official confirmation of the variant in our six cases - it is being investigated by the National Influenza Reference Laboratory at the State Health Institute in Prague," the director said.
She added that they are two nurses from the same workplace at the Faculty Hospital in Brno and two children of one of them, as well as two 11-year-old pupils from the Adamov secondary school.
There is no connection between the cases in Brno and those of Adam.
Three of them have mild symptoms, four are asymptomatic.
No one suspected of having Omikron abroad
None of the individuals travelled abroad, nor did anyone in their families, and no one has been in contact with anyone who has been abroad.
There is no connection with the water polo championship, said Ciupek.
The chief hygienist, Pavla Svrčinová, previously stated that an international water polo tournament was being checked, which took place in Brno a few weeks ago.
Players from South Africa and one Belgian player fell ill after returning.
California will limit gun sales.
He wants to act like Texas in its abortion ban.
California Governor Gavin Newsom announced Saturday a plan to ban the sale and manufacture of some firearms through a legal mechanism used by Texas in its controversial fetal heartbeat abortion law.
People would then be entitled to damages from anyone who manufactures or sells assault weapons or homemade firearms in California.
Newsom's announcement came in response to a Friday ruling by the U.S. Supreme Court that upheld a Texas law banning abortions after a fetal heartbeat is detected, though it goes against a 50-year-old precedent that established a right to abortion nationwide up to about the 24th week of pregnancy.
However, the court did not rule on the constitutionality of the entire law, but on a technical issue arising from the innovative design of the measure.
The ban was thus enforced in this case by the public, which prevented the Texas Republicans from challenging it in the usual way.
"I am outraged by the Supreme Court's (Friday) decision to allow Texas' ban on most abortions to remain in place and largely support Texas' effort to protect its law," the California governor said in a statement.
"If states can now block review of their laws by federal courts, then California will use that power to protect human life," Newsom continued.
He reportedly instructed his subordinates to work with the state parliament and the justice minister to enact measures that would allow members of the public to enforce the ban on assault weapons and so-called ghost guns.
Homemade weapons without serial numbers can be used to circumvent regulations.
Newsom wants to give "private citizens" the right to sue for at least $10,000 (over 220,000 CZK) in damages and court costs from anyone who manufactures, distributes or sells assault weapons, "ghost guns," or kits to make them in California.
"If the most effective way to keep these horrible weapons out of our streets is to create a threat of private lawsuits, then that's exactly what we should do," the California governor said.
The AP notes that California has banned the manufacture and sale of some military-style weapons for decades, but a federal judge blocked the state's ban as unconstitutional in June.
If the state were to actually reinstate the ban using the Texas model, it would be confirmed by the words of liberal Supreme Court Justice Sonia Sotomayor, who in a dissenting opinion to the Friday majority ruling warned against expanding the legal mechanism to other US states.
The Supreme Court, however, did not grant the Texas abortion ban complete immunity from judicial review and allowed abortion clinics to proceed with lawsuits against certain state officials.
Every emergency vaccination has its public testing phase, where the vaccination schedule is gradually worked out and the vaccines themselves are improved based on the results.
For example, Israel is already conducting a large-scale study on the effects of four doses.
And according to these studies, in the majority of patients, a five-fold increase in antibodies is achieved, which has a long-term effect.
It's just like any other vaccine, it will eventually have its schedule, but it's just too soon.
Another fact is that a new vaccine based on inactivated virus is expected to reach the market soon, which according to the manufacturer's specifications promises up to 10x greater efficacy.
It's okay to leave some of the lessons behind.
But to re-evaluate CO is to learn.
Since the days of Marie-Thérèse, our civilization and technology have progressed a bit, and learning phone books and filling out textbooks into notebooks doesn't make much sense anymore and is a waste of time.
In these things, it would be a brutal take-down.
On the other hand, how many people leave high school with some basic financial literacy?
And the other things that will be absolutely necessary for life?
How can I legally watch the Champions League online?
Do you know if there is any online service here in the Czech Republic that would allow me to watch the Champions League for a fee?
At home we have Netbox and I subscribe to the sports package Telly for the Spanish and English football leagues.
However, it does not include the UEFA Champions League.
I think O2 offers the Champions League, but I don't want to change my TV and internet provider.
Poland threatened to stop payments to the EU budget
According to Ziobro, the European Commission would act unlawfully if it used its new powers to withhold payments to Poland in a dispute over the rule of law.
The Commission has already postponed the approval of the Polish plan to draw 36 billion euros from the EU Recovery Fund to help economies hit by the Covid-19 pandemic.
And it is under pressure from the European Parliament to go further and use the mechanism to claw back EU funding from countries that breach the principle of the rule of law.
"Poland should respond to this EU diktat by vetoing on all issues requiring unanimity," said Ziobro, head of the small Solidarna Polska party, which would lose a narrow majority in parliament without its votes.
"Poland should also consider its commitments in the EU energy and climate policy, which leads to a drastic increase in energy prices," Ziobro added.
If the dispute continues, I will ask Poland to stop its contributions to the EU.
It would be justified given the fact that the EU is illegally withholding funds from the common budget, which we also contribute to, added the Polish minister.
Its stance on the EU is more radical than that of the ruling Justice and Development Party.
According to the European Commission, the changes to the Polish judiciary under Ziobro's tenure threaten its independence and subordinate it to politicians.
Ziobro says Brussels is setting "impossible conditions" because its goal is not a legal state, but a change of government in Poland.
Warsaw is facing "a political diktat imposed by intimidation and an attempt to overturn democratic decisions by several million Poles," Ziobro also said.
He said Poland should be a member of such an EU based on the partnership of sovereign states, not on the rule of the most powerful and the Brussels bureaucracy, which is not under democratic control.
He said his party would never accept such concessions from Brussels, which would limit Poland's sovereignty.
"We will never agree to make Poland a colony," he said.
But to identify it... We have one kind of cheese in Lidl, in four different places.
I didn't look at anything else, I've met yogurt more times than I can count, I just needed cheese, Parmigiano Reggiano, after ten minutes in the dairy aisle I gave up and asked.
They did have it, it's true, in the narrow sector, all the selected, less common and special cheeses, but it was between the vegetables and the lactose-free zone...
If there is a strike, I won't even go to the market, action or no action, the gold shop on the square doesn't have such a selection, but they usually have everything I need and it's organized, so I can get what I need in ten minutes.
To Lidlu to take a break.
And I don't care about that anymore.
I've watched for two years how they handle data like manure, and most of the anti-vaxxers are just a little bit more out of touch than most of the pro-vaxxers.
The rational debate is taking place at an academic level, but the extreme views are entering the public space.
They keep going from one wall to the next.
Binary thinking: vaccination will save us, vaccination is useless.
To ban everything, to allow everything.
Colorful cakes instead of robust analyses.
Comparing apples to oranges.
That's how it is in this state and that's how it is here.
But the data collection methodology is different in those two states, and no one is addressing that.
Fuj, I'm relieved.
Sorry for the outburst and I wish you all a good day.
I was punished as a child with a stew.
It was never about the grades, it was mostly about me repeatedly refusing to listen and being defiant (I read instead of going to bed, I washed my hair instead of going to sleep, etc).
At the same time, I've never been punished without warning, my mother always threatened me first that if I did it again, I'd get a spanking (and sometimes even after a spanking, she just brought out the spoon and put it down so I could see it).
Only after I repeatedly refused to listen did I get a few slaps on the bottom (through clothing).
Personally, I think physical discipline (in a reasonable manner and amount) is beneficial because the child responds much more to physical discipline than to words.
I think the important part is the warning part, because it gives the child a choice: am I going to listen or am I going to get a time-out?
I just needed to be warned that I should start listening.
The defense system
When a prominent Czech lawyer and constitutional judge Vojtěch Cepl was asked in 1999 what the Czech constitution meant to him - whether it was a sacred document on which one swears or a contract that can be changed if necessary - he clearly preferred the first option.
Once we agreed on democratic rules of our life, which also define who we are as a state and its citizens, and with changes it is better to deal with.
And imagine: some nations actually have rules they like.
Just as Czechs like to eat pork and cabbage dumplings, Vojtěch Cepl asked the question.
However, there is a growing consensus among lawyers that the Czech Constitution needs to be amended.
The years are tested by situations that its creators (Vojtěch Cepl was one of them) could not predict, such as the behavior of the directly elected president.
Cepl was right on one point, though.
What we know about such documents is that political intervention in their texts must be deliberate.
It must be understood and actively defended, only then can it be the key to managing most of the crises that societies face across history.
The constitution is, among other things, a kind of rule book for governing, setting out the rules that politicians must follow.
We fear that it will be abused against minorities or individuals, so we tie politicians' hands with prohibitions.
At the same time, however, constitutional texts also allow politicians to abuse their power.
Covid does not discriminate, several-month-old infant is fighting for his life at FN Brno
Although it is known that the coronavirus is milder in children, there are also severe cases that hospitals are dealing with, especially recently.
"We know that children are more vulnerable and affected less than adults, speaking of 2 to 5 percent compared to adults," said Dr. Petr Dominik, head of the Department of Paediatric Anaesthesia and Resuscitation at the University Hospital Brno and the Faculty of Medicine of Masaryk University.
The course is much easier, lighter, often symptom-free.
However, there are children who are seriously ill with the coronavirus, as we have seen in recent weeks," said Dominik.
The doctor said there were dozens of children who needed a little bit of support.
It's at a pediatric infectious disease clinic.
Very seriously ill children with coronavirus are now being admitted to ARU for the first time.
Children with post-covid syndromes have been on the ward continuously throughout the year, according to the doctor.
"Now we're seeing a surge in children with acute COVID-19, which is meaning they're having respiratory failure, meaning they need to be on a ventilator," he said, adding that the illness is affecting not only adults but also adolescents and infants as young as a few months old.
Children are also being admitted to intensive care units due to the coronavirus.
"We currently have infants, toddlers and adolescents," the chief said.
However, he is pleased that the children's hospital in Brno has not yet recorded any deaths from the coronavirus.
According to available data, six children aged 0 to 14 died in the Czech Republic on December 6.
According to Dominik, a psychologist is an integral part of cooperation in the children's hospital - not just on the coronavirus ward.
It also points out that just like in adults, vaccination also reduces the course of the disease in children and at the same time reduces the incidence of post-covid syndrome.
"That is why we recommend vaccination for children as well," the doctor added.
In the quiet zone, you can only walk on marked paths.
But the quiet zones aren't that big.
They are visible on the tourist map at mapy.cz.
In general, in national parks outside the rest zone you can walk anywhere (but not through the fence into the enclosure).
Skiing/cycling in the forest outside marked trails is not allowed anywhere unless you have an exemption (but of course this is not strictly enforced outside national parks).
How does a conductor practice?
Music is in my head, Josef Kurfiřt laughs.
It is a loan from the Liberec Opera and originally played the bassoon.
He can sing practically all repertoar as a singer, and as a conductor he works not only in the F. X. Šalda Theatre in Liberec, but also in Plzeň, in the Josef Kajetán Tyl Theatre.
He collaborates with the Hradec Králové Philharmonic, the Film Philharmonic or the Podkrkonošský symfonický orchestr.
China projects image of controlled contagion as authoritarian regime faces crisis
Sinologist Jirouš: China is creating the impression of a well-managed epidemic and that the authoritarian regime is better able to cope with the crisis.
China has launched a health and political offensive.
A few months ago, Beijing was criticized for not being able to contain the outbreak that has turned into a global pandemic.
Now the country is reporting zero new cases.
Countries including the Czech Republic are competing for Chinese protective gear, and Chinese doctors are helping to fight the coronavirus in many places, including hard-hit Italy.
How should we interpret Beijing's willingness?
Is it friendly support or is the communist regime trying to improve its image in the world?
He meets a friend of a friend and says, "Hey, you want an elephant?"
I have it and it's great.
His wife is happy because he's mowing the lawn, washing the car, and playing with the kids.
Well, that's just great.
If you want to buy a elephant for 5000,- I'll sell it to you.
Friend: Well, it's going to be a good laugh, that's for sure...
After some time they meet up and the one who bought complains: what did you sell for a elephant????
The lawn is flattened, everywhere there are giant piles of shit, the car is wrecked, the kids are terrified, and the wife wants a divorce.
The one who sold it says: "You don't talk about elephants like that, you don't sell elephants like that."
World events are controlled by the superpowers.
Despite the equality of sovereign states, it is the great powers that determine the course of international events.
Europe can only become a great power if it works on its integration.
It works at the economic and political level (on certain issues), but military integration is still lacking.
Personally, I think Europe is heading towards federalism.
It won't happen in 10, 15 or 20 years.
But maybe in the middle of the century, the mood will change and it will happen.
I thought of that, and it's a possibility.
I'm not an expert in Czech, so I may have made a mistake.
I just take the fact that an ellipse usually includes 2 different units at the same level.
I'll borrow an example from another comment, "Spanish oranges and mandarins," where it's clear that both are from Spain, whereas with "Spanish fruit and mandarins," it's not clear that the mandarins are from Spain.
Also, I'm basing this on the fact that the quote says "all American might," including their weapons, and I know that American complexes are run by Americans only.
In other words, I expect it to be included in the broader umbrella and not something that needs to be specified for the US forces.
But again, just for the sake of fun :D
It is either one or the other, it is an unreasonable demand
A 5.0 magnitude earthquake was recorded in Tokyo.
The Japanese capital Tokyo and surrounding areas were hit by an earthquake measuring 5.0 on the Richter scale on Sunday.
Witnesses said buildings swayed in the capital, but there were no reports of damage.
There was no tsunami warning issued, Reuters reported.
Vicki Holland from the UK tortured a monkey called Milly
The disturbing footage shows the terrified monkey cowering in a toilet before its callous owner flushed it and gagged it.
Holland also fed the monkeys sausages, kebabs and hamburgers, regardless of her actual nutritional needs.
A Gwent magistrates court has now banned the woman from keeping animals for life, The Sun reports.
The primate rehabilitation experts caring for Milly after her abuse have said they have never seen a cosmonaut so terrified.
Milly spent almost two years rehabilitating at Monkey World in Dorset and now plays happily with another rescued monkey called Moon.
The quadruple mother admitted to two counts of causing unnecessary suffering to a protected animal.
She was sentenced to 12 weeks in prison, suspended for 12 months, at Gwent Magistrates' Court.
Holland was also sentenced to 120 hours of unpaid work, a life-long ban on keeping animals and was ordered to pay CZK 12,000 in court costs.
The head of the Small Monkeys team that rehabilitated the abused animal, Steph Sawyer, said: "Milly is fine, but the rehabilitation will continue."
Milly took a long time to get used to people again.
She would crouch and hide from anyone she met and any loud noise or sudden movement would cause her to scream.
Opička refused to eat for a long time.
Now that she's settled and happy with her mate, she can still trigger panic at the sight of new people.
The psychological scars from the abuse will stay with her forever, says Sawyer.
The abuse of Milly came to light after police in Gwent found sickening footage on her phone after raiding her flat on suspicion of drug dealing.
On the tapes, you can hear Milly swearing.
In the next video, Holland offers the monkey some cocaine and says, "You want some cocaine?"
That's how I lick my fingers.
In May, along with her partner Russell Cox (43), she admitted to possessing cocaine with intent to supply.
Hidden in Kinder eggs at her home was cocaine worth £1,600 (around 50,000 Czech crowns).
Cox was subsequently sentenced to 30 months in prison and Holland was given a suspended sentence of 20 months.
And what amazing concepts do you learn three times in a row when you valiantly skip over the entire 20th century?
Like you're going to take the same things you took in sixth grade?
And all of that kills the idea of being a nerd, where nobody cares if you're smart or not.
Just write the test for 1 and then no one will care.
Go out and ask people on the street if they can handle the roots of a quadratic equation and the coefficients.
Everyone has gone through it, and an absolute majority won't bat an eyelid and tell you they're absolutely fine.
So what are they learning?
I'm a big fan of general knowledge and the fact is that people don't and don't need to.
And at that moment, it's pointless and you'll never get it into them.
It's partly learned for the many people who will need it.
But like, the note that says you don't really need all this stuff at the machine, I took that very seriously... ...because you don't.
And we are slowly getting to the point where not knowing is a sign of being punk.
(The price of letting the barbarians run our machines is just too high) But the price of letting the barbarians run our machines is just too high.
If journalists could count, then Covid probably wouldn't have reached these dimensions.
At first glance: The wedding of Kadri and Andrey continues!
That's the main reason why Switzerland can't leave now," Andrea answered on Instagram in Stories to curious fans' questions about what disappointed her so much at Kadrim that she decided to cut off all contact and even block him on social media.
From the start of the experiment, Kadri and Andreou have been at loggerheads.
The main problem was that Kadri lived and worked in Switzerland and his idea was that Andrea would move out, at least until he moved back to the Czech Republic permanently.
She flatly refused to do so.
And as can be seen, their relationship did not end with love, but rather turned into mutual contempt and hatred.
It was an attack planned by you! Kadri was furious in response to Andreino's accusations of lies, gambling and debts.
Kadri's alleged honesty didn't sit well with his ex-wife or his younger sister Linda.
She decided to publicly defend her brother.
I don't normally talk about this kind of thing, and we never really talked about this kind of thing in my family.
I don't want to stir up any pity.
But when I see someone trying to publicly hurt and tarnish the name of someone I love so much, it just won't do!
I'm sorry I have to do this, but I wanted to publicly thank my brother Kadri for turning himself into a character and helping our family when we needed it most, despite how young he was.
It's worse when I have to read such false information, which is probably taken out of context.
I would like everyone to know Kadri as I do, our loved ones and family stand in solidarity in response to Andrey's words.
I am really grateful for everything!
Of course people will believe what is written, but the most important thing is that we, his family, love him more than anything and know the truth and know how it really was.
The drunken burglar climbed up the facade to the fifth floor.
You won't believe why.
Chao began his crime spree at a parking lot in a residential area, where he tried to break into several cars.
According to available information, he eventually stripped one vehicle of the equivalent of less than CZK 330.
He didn't think of anything better than to climb up to the fifth floor and enter the apartment through an open window.
He stole two bananas.
In one security camera footage, he is seen walking away from the scene of the crime and eating a banana.
When the flat owner woke up in the morning, he discovered that the bananas were not where he left them and called the police.
It then grabbed Cchaa.
The man admitted that he had consumed alcohol on the day in question.
And since he needed money, he decided to rob the till.
The whole thing is still under investigation.
The drunk climbed up the facade to the 5th floor and stole two bananas.
The pandemic law is time-limited and is only effective in the event of a pandemic emergency.
When it is repealed, the law will no longer be in effect.
The law, however, restricts the scope of business
That's not enough for you?
The right to assemble will be restricted, but not abolished.
More than 60 percent of voters turned out for Saturday's municipal elections in four towns
New mayors were elected in the villages of Komňa on Uherskohradišťsko, Lužice on Mostecku, Nová Ves on Liberec and Rovná on Pelhřimovsko on Saturday.
The number of councillors in these towns fell below the legal minimum or the elected councils split up.
A total of 99 candidates contested the 28 seats on Saturday.
The average age of the newly elected representatives is 46.7 years.
The oldest is 69, the youngest 33.
The processing of the results of the Saturday elections symbolically closes a relatively difficult but successful year for us.
Four new or repeat elections to municipal councils took place, and the very closely watched elections to the Chamber of Deputies were also held, said Eva Krumpová, vice-president of the ČSÚ.
She recalled that the Covid-19 pandemic made the election more challenging in terms of equipment and staffing.
In Komna in the Uherskohradišť region, the Association of Independent Candidates won Saturday's election with 27.76 percent of the vote and two mandates in the seven-member council.
STAN candidate received 24.84 percent of the votes, which also means two mandates.
Citizens for Komňu also won two seats on the council, with 18.52 percent of the vote.
The incumbent mayor of the municipality, Jana Křižková, who is a member of the Association of Private Practitioners, also got back into the council.
Komňané - independent candidates - won one seat on the council.
75.48 percent of eligible voters turned out.
In the village of Rovná in Pelhřimov, the Pro Rovnou association won.
It received 50.50 percent of the votes, which means four of the seven seats.
Two representatives from the Association of Independent Candidates 1 and one from the Association of Independent Candidates 2 also made it into the municipal council.
Turnout was 93.62 percent.
The Lužičtí a Svinčiceové (Lužičians and Svinčians) group, led by the mayor, Jindřich John, has won the Lužičtí a Svinčiceové (Lužičians and Svinčians) group, led by the mayor, Jindřich John, has won the Lužičtí a Svinčiceové (Lužičians and Svinčians) group, led by the mayor, Jindřich John, has won the Lužičtí a Svinčiceové (Lužičians and Svinčians) group, led by the mayor, Jindřich John, has won the Lužičtí a Svinčiceové (Lužičians and Svinčians) group, led by the mayor, Jindřich John, has won the Lužičtí a Svinčiceové (Lužičians and Svinčians) group, led by the mayor, Jindřich John, has won the Lužičtí a Svinčiceové (Lužičians and Svinčians) group, led by the mayor, Jindřich John, has won the Lužič
It received 56.73 percent of the vote and, like in 2018, has four seats on the seven-member council.
The second placed candidate of Obec pro lid, which received 43.27 percent of the vote, will have three representatives on the council.
76.7 percent of voters turned out.
The New Village elections in Liberec were won by independent candidates Naděje pro Novou Ves ahead of the ANO movement.
The independent candidate coalition received 59.88 percent of the vote and won four of the seven seats on the municipal council.
ANO received 40.12 percent of the votes and strengthened the regular elections in 2018, it got more mandates and has three.
Turnout was 42.9 percent.
The State Election Commission will discuss the election results on Monday.
They will then be published in the Official Journal.
What do you think is the bigger problem?
A dead civilian or a foreign official?
I think all of this stuff that people are writing to you, you know, it's all good.
You just play dumb so you have someone to "argue" with.
If not, then it's sad.
I'm not saying Christians are degenerates, or anything like that.
I even like a lot of church architecture from an aesthetic point of view (which was the point, after all, to look good).
And I don't really care who believes what.
On the other hand, I dislike how much power the church had in the Middle Ages, how much money they spent, how they suppressed science, etc.
Not to mention all the wars it caused, such as the Thirty Years' War.
TL;DR: Believe in the spaghetti monster, but the state and the church have nothing to do with each other
The man fell twelve metres and hit his head.
The concrete barrier survived.
The incredible fall survived a man in Ostrava on Sunday night, who was attended by paramedics from the Regional Emergency Medical Service.
Staff at the regional emergency operations center took the call at 1 a.m. Saturday with the initial report of a man falling from the sky.
Two rescue teams from the ZZS - medical and rescue - rushed to the scene.
When paramedics arrived at the scene, they discovered that the 28-year-old man had fallen from a height of around 12 metres and landed on his head on concrete!
Coal was being mined in Vítkovice.
But not in the way it should have, and firefighters went in.
When the emergency services arrived, the man was unconscious with multiple injuries and in a life-threatening condition.
The attending physician intubated his airways, provided him with artificial lung ventilation and transported him to the further care of the Ostrava trauma centre in ambulance, informed the spokesperson for the Regional Health Authority of the Moravian-Silesian Region, Lukáš Humpl.
I'm more worried about the public's and government's inadequate responses than the coronavirus
The spread of the coronavirus in the Czech Republic is a challenge for politicians and officials, but the front line of the fight against the infection is primarily doctors and medical staff.
How serious is the situation from their perspective?
We speak to military doctor David Rezac.
Editor: Matěj Válek Research: Tomáš Roček, sound engineer: David Kaiser, music: Martin Hůla
Legendary Nunes falls after seven years, Oliveira retains belt
MMA saw a fantastic night of results.
Things were happening at UFC 269.
The outsider Julianna Peña was able to defeat the legendary Amanda Nunes, who had gone seven years without a loss.
Charles Oliveira outstruck Dustin Poirier in the lightweight division and defended his belt.
Kai Kara-France also picked up a victory, as he quickly dropped Cody Garbrandt with a technical knockout in the first round.
He also defeated Sean O'Malley.
A surprise no one expected.
It brought a women's bantamweight bout between the legendary Amanda Nunes and Julianna Peña.
The American entered the match as a kind of "dwarf," having not lost in seven years and polishing her teeth for another victory.
Moreover, the beginning of the duel was in the spirit of paper assumptions.
Nunes started the fight aggressively and even landed a push kick that sent her opponent to the ground.
However, she was not deterred from committing another error and tried to attack with a racket on her own hand.
The second round was thrilling and very exciting for MMA fans.
Both women were peppered with a flurry of punches and hard hooks.
Nunes was also left on the ground, where she was repeatedly kicked.
She had to give up and pull away from the attack.
The American shocked everyone when she became the new champion.
The highlight of the night was the battle between Charles Oliveira and Dustin Poirier for the interim lightweight title.
At first, it was Poirier who was doing better, but the cards started to turn against him.
In the second, Oliveira was more active, trying to land punches on his opponent.
It didn't work out for him, but afterwards he put a lot of pressure on his opponent, got him on his back and rained down a lot of punches.
That's how he won the second round.
In the third round, Oliveira showed a rear naked choke, which Poirier resisted for a while, but then had to tap out.
The Brazilian defended his title, while Poirier lost after two years.
In the next bout, Sean O'Malley secured a dominant victory over Raulian Paiva, who was knocked out in the first round with a hard right to the chin.
He then went on to record a fifteenth victory with a series of precise strikes.
Kara-France then dealt with Cody Garbrandt.
In the spring, Nunes celebrated another victory with her little daughter, now she has lost after seven years.
That hip, or that hip?
At first glance, it doesn't seem complicated.
Most Czech nouns express only one grammatical gender, so there is no problem in determining whether they are masculine, feminine or neuter.
But there is also a fairly large group of substantive nouns that do not have a fixed gender.
Such significant names are bouncing back and forth between the two families.
When they are plural, they take on a double-ended shape and in some cases remain in that form.
For example, the words "svízel" and "kyčel" are masculine and feminine, respectively, in the first they are declined according to the pattern "stroj", in the second according to the pattern "píseň".
For another group of nouns, the different forms are already present in the first singular, for example: "row/rows", "kedluben/kedlubna" or "brambor/brambora" (in the sense of food).
Both forms are standard, have the same meaning, and are therefore interchangeable.
Some words may vary regionally, for example "okurka" in Bohemia and "okurek" in Moravia, in this case, however, the Moravian variant is incorrect, as are other Czech-Moravian pairs of words: "příkop" and "příkopa", "kobliha" and "koblih" and so on.
Some words that have entered Czech from other languages were originally non-inflected, but they are gradually acquiring Czech endings.
A typical example is the word "image," which is masculine and feminine, or the word "buffet," which has remained in the neuter in German, but has masculine endings according to the pattern of "hof."
Turkey has opened the door for migrants to Europe.
What is the situation at the Greek border?
Tension is building on the Greek-Turkish border as the number of migrants trying to reach Europe grows.
Thousands of people have started to cross the southern border of the Schengen area after Ankara stopped preventing them.
European politicians promise Greece support, and the Czech government is also preparing humanitarian aid.
What drives refugees to take such a perilous journey?
And what is the situation on the ground?
We haven't seen blue skies for three months and we're sick of it, says a Sydney journalist
The fires have killed almost 30 people and hundreds of millions of animals, and have destroyed millions of hectares of land.
How are the authorities and the local population coping with the disaster?
Could the Morrison government have done more to avoid the dire consequences, critics say?
And what will countries have to prepare for in the future in relation to climate change?
Lenka Kabrhelová speaks to Sydney-based journalist Ika Detrich.
False accusations have always been rare.
That's why they are always written everywhere.
People are uncomfortable dealing with how prevalent sexual violence is in our society and how horrendously widespread it is, so they try to sweep it under the rug.
I don't personally know anyone who has been wrongfully convicted.
I know a lot of people who have been raped and I've seen how their communities or the police treat them.
Victims should always be believed.
The trend is that victims are finally opening up about their trauma.
But it's still a bit of a secret for a lot of people.
Yes, there are those who falsely accuse others.
It's disgusting and a smear on every victim of sexual assault, but by spreading the idea that "a lot of the accusations are false" and that it's a "trend" you're only helping the perpetrators.
Czech Republic is flooded with unfinished houses, families can't afford to finish
Construction materials prices have risen more than 30 percent in the last few weeks and months.
A number of people have found themselves in a precarious situation.
He doesn't have the money to finish the houses he's already built, and the banks won't give him any more mortgages.
In addition to the cost of materials, the cost of construction work is also increasing.
That's why people don't have enough money to finish the already built houses.
In many cases, banks refuse to increase mortgage loans, which creates extremely unpleasant situations.
At best, people move into houses that have been built and left unfinished.
In the worst case, the newly built houses are uninhabitable and families are forced to sell them because they cannot afford to pay their mortgages and also pay rent," says BHS economist Štěpán Křeček.
We're building two to three family homes a year and we're at 50 per cent of that.
As a construction company, it's difficult because we have to abide by certain things in the contract, even though the materials have gone up in price.
So we're doing it for nothing," said the owner of the construction company Zdeněk Slivoň.
Many people will only have financial problems.
If they had expected to pay $5 million for the house, it will now cost $7 million.
I think some will wait," Slivon added.
The most expensive items stolen were copper, iron and plumbing and heating equipment.
But construction firms are also struggling with a shortage of workers.
There are not enough graduates in the construction trades in the Czech Republic, and the influx of foreign workers is being held back by the pandemic.
At the moment, the situation with the issuance of building permits is the only positive one.
"Building authorities issued 7,675 building permits in October, which is almost 10 percent more than a year ago," Křeček explained.
We're doing well and we'll do even better.
However, the real vision is lacking, says the commentator ČRO – MujRozhlas
In addition to classical celebrations, politicians have traditionally used New Year's Eve to make speeches.
This year, apart from the Prime Minister and the Chairman of ANO Andrej Babiš, the President's Christmas message was also read by the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the Chamber of Deputies.
What's the big news?
Just like with my diploma, I have my own topic, I chose it myself, I'm following on from my bachelor's degree, I always do this for a whole year and then I write the written part in a week or two.
The states are pretty quiet about us, unless you're a total moron and something's stuck in your head, then the commission won't be too interested in the theory.
I learned to study for a week for the SATs and when I was stumped, the committee would always try to guide me to some sort of logical deduction, and boom, I got it right.
Otherwise, to those projects, I know people who pay someone to do their semester project (we did it a lot, really worthwhile, taught a lot) and then they just learn the project and have it done.
I think it's great when there's an exam at the end of a subject, where the knowledge gained through the project is applied, not just defended.
But do not send any e-mails or phone calls and do not send any packages to the embassy.
You'll be the same guy as them.
Those people at the embassy have nothing to do with it.
And if they were against Russia, they would risk a lot, so they might have to play with them, because otherwise something could happen to them.
But you can also put up a similar statue of Putin next to the bear.
Třebas would then give it to Xi Jinping so that it scratches his back or something.
I agree, even though Insta is throwing artists under the bus.
Once you post stories and at least one picture every other day, your reach will drop to absolute minimum.
Plus, it's constantly changing what's more important, likes, comments, or storage.
I've been feeling pretty shitty lately, so maybe I'll have to scale back to TikTok, where a lot of my peers are having success and they're not allowed to fail.
Ultimately, I might even welcome something more user-friendly that doesn't squeeze all the creativity and energy out of artists.
The statement of the Labour Party on Donbass
The alliance - yes, the break-up - no, they express their opinion on the break-up of the Soviet Union.
Thirty years since the illegal break-up of the Soviet Union.
On December 8, 1991, the most geopolitically catastrophic event in human history took place.
On December 8, 1991, Boris Yeltsin, Leonid Kravchuk, and Stanislav Shushkevich, without any legal authority and in violation of the results of the March 17 referendum, with an openly conciliatory attitude towards Mikhail S. Gorbachev, signed an agreement that "the Union of the Soviet Socialist Republics as a subject of international law and as a geopolitical reality ceases to exist."
One stroke of the pen "erased" a huge country with almost three hundred million people.
Tens of millions of ethnic Russian citizens found themselves abroad after the collapse of the Soviet Union.
Since the early 1990s, Russia's population has fallen by ten to eleven million.
Even without the loss of the Russian population of former Soviet republics, we have already lost more people than in two world wars combined!
Earlier, the same people who destroyed what had been built up in Belovezhskaya Pushcha in one sitting in the 1950s, betrayed the socialist camp (created at the cost of millions of lives in the Second World War and the Great Patriotic War).
Consciously they de-industrialized, they slowed down agriculture, they severed fourteen republics that had previously been economically linked by a single mechanism.
If we look deeper, we see population decline, the collapse of the economy, science, the military, the rise of crime, inter-ethnic conflict, the war in Chechnya, all the conflicts in the post-Soviet space, the orange revolutions, NATO's eastward expansion, the war and the breakup of Yugoslavia, the Arab Spring, the war in Syria - all of this is the result of geopolitical capitulation, of giving up first the socialist camp, and then the Soviet Union.
There is such a concept in political science as "the vacuum of power."
Everything that was rushed and given away was quickly filled and taken over by NATO, which accepted our geopolitical capitulation.
And the world is still reeling, mainly due to events of the late 1980s and early 1990s.
The price of a product sold in a large supermarket may not necessarily reflect its quality or freshness.
It's Monday and we have some meat in the supermarket for 189 Kč / kg.
I'll buy it and put it in the fridge and make it for dinner on Thursday.
In an alternative reality, where I don't buy meat on a Monday, it will be Tuesday when the chain will reduce the price to 99 CZK/kg - explain to me the mechanism by which this meat will become a burden on my digestive system?
Or I'll wait until Thursday and the meat will be 1 day before the date of consumption reduced to 69 CZK / kg - what would this meat differ from what I bought on Monday for 120 CZK and left in my fridge for 3 days?
I will answer myself - nothing.
Those people who say that if something is cheap, then it must be bad, rotten or of poor quality are horrendously retarded, to put it mildly.
Now, recently I went to Hlavas in Brno and a lady was handing out some brochures, I always take things like that to help the brigadiers, they can't get rid of it...
No, the brochure was full of common sense and conservative views on the workings of the world, but nothing about God, I was confused, but I knew it would be some kind of propaganda.
After reading it, I found out who was publishing it and in the end it turned out to be Scientology.
Well, it was a good matroš, full of all sorts of useless lessons, like I should get married and stop smoking.
The paper is a waste of paper, as the forests would not have been cut down.
I've been through something similar with my ex-girlfriend.
Psychological manipulation and emotional blackmail will make you comply with that person because you love them, without you realizing how much that situation sucks.
She threatened me several times for going out with a guy she didn't like.
Or when I wanted to leave her apartment earlier, she broke down and begged me not to leave.
Then she started physically blocking the door.
For a year, it was a great relationship, but then another six months went by and she started getting headaches.
Then I ended the relationship with her because I told her that I was breaking up and she lied to me but I can talk about it next week to calm her down and not to catch any amok.
Such a person sucks the city, the emotions and the overall joy out of you.
Better to keep a safe distance
When insurance companies are frantically buying up test kits and chasing up positives who would never have known about the deadly disease but for the test.
The only thing we're achieving is complications for businesses, hauliers and others because their employees have been given five days of house arrest by a random number generator.
In the West, they've stopped messing around with it and have admitted that it's not worth trying to treat an illness that's less well-known than the flu.
Unfortunately Válek is new and still has to fill his ego with bullshit.
I look back and I see the old good shmejd coming back.
After a few years of quiet and suppression of this dirty business, MLM recruiting is back in the spotlight.
I was one of the recruits, I tried it (I was 20, a freshman in college), the initial promises of training on products and business skills quickly turned into "it doesn't matter, just get people."
I was genuinely interested in the products I was selling because I wanted to help people, but the training was more on how to scare and laugh at people.
When the first checks came in, people quickly realized that if they wanted to make money, they had to hit a few certain products every month.
Investment life insurance and mortgages were the only sources of income, so one felt like a door-to-door salesman.
But what can I say, the experience was valuable, one learns not to jump on every rumour and to check information thoroughly.
I would not put all of them in one basket.
People in this business are successful and even beneficial to others, but they certainly won't be bragging about expensive consumer goods or "fat" accounts.
At the company I work for, I've never seen so many of these things.
HR is happy, managers are managing, and no one is micromanaging us.
So the regular evaluation is happening, in the form that it happens here, it's pretty good (set some goals for the next year, look back at the end of the year and see how you did) - it's more of a self-evaluation than someone evaluating you based on some numbers, and so on.
The company's actions are also optional.
But we are also a bit unique within our own company - we have departments that are more corporate.
Sometimes you feel like you're almost a startup squatting in the offices of a big corporation.
But it doesn't really bother us until the results come out.
The Czech woman missing in Britain has died.
Her body was found in London.
Almost ten days later, British police were still searching for a 32-year-old Czech woman who went missing at the end of November.
On Sunday, December 12, the Minister of Foreign Affairs in the caretaker government, Jakub Kulhánek, announced on social media that the woman from Uherskohradiště was found dead.
British police today confirmed to our embassy in London that they have found the body of the Czech citizen who went missing.
The cause of death is being investigated.
Given the family's wishes, we will not be releasing any additional information on this case.
Kulhánek tweeted his sincere condolences.
The young woman was last seen on November 28th on a bus on her way home from work, before withdrawing money from an ATM.
Her disappearance was reported five days later by co-workers.
She was then reported missing by the London police, who put her on Interpol's most-wanted list.
It was also found in the Czech Republic's missing persons database.
The police have already detained one man in connection with this.
What his role was and what he suspects, but has not revealed.
Four municipalities elected new councils at the end of the year
On Saturday 11 December, new councils were elected in Komňa, Lužice, Nová Ves and Rovná in Uherskohradišťsk, Mostecko, Liberec and Pelhřimov respectively.
The number of councillors in these towns fell below the legal minimum or the elected councils split up.
In the new elections, 99 valid candidates stood for 28 seats.
Turnout reached 62.41%.
The highest turnout was recorded in the village of Rovná, where 93.62% of eligible voters voted.
The mandate received a total of 8 women and 20 men.
The average age of the elected officials is 46.7 years.
The oldest is 69, the youngest 33.
A total of 13 candidate lists were registered for the new council elections in the four municipalities.
36 women and 63 men ran for 28 seats.
The average age of the candidates was 46.6 years.
The youngest candidate was 22, the oldest 72.
The processing of the results of the Saturday elections symbolically closes a relatively difficult but successful year for us.
Four new or repeat elections for municipal councils took place, and the very closely watched election to the Chamber of Deputies.
We had to work in more demanding epidemiological conditions, which put greater demands on equipment and personnel, said Eva Krumpová, 1st Vice President of the Czech Statistical Office.
The last precinct was processed on Sunday, December 12 at 3:49 a.m.
On Monday, the results of the vote will be presented to the State Election Commission, and once approved, they will be published in the Official Gazette.
This is the biggest problem I have with the whole pandemic.
Adjusting to having a potentially deadly disease was a bit of a shock at first, but it's been going pretty smoothly.
I have a problem with dealing with the idiocy of a large part of the population at all levels.
I'm most looking forward to the vaccine (tomorrow!) because it will finally make me less dependent on other people not being assholes.
He would be removed from office and disqualified from holding office again.
The chances of that actually happening are, however, pretty slim.
Moreover, I am not sure if the act of filing a report would be considered treason.
Velezrada is such a crime that the President of the Republic endangers the sovereignty, territorial integrity, or the democratic character of the state.
It must have been something more serious.
How the pandemic has affected intimacy: The number of people aged 35 and under who are having sex less than once a year is rising
More and more young adults in the US are living their lives without sex.
They are mainly people of faith, the Daily Mail website says.
The survey showed that from 2008 to 2021, the proportion of people aged 35 and under who gave up sex rose from eight to 21 percent.
Women aged 18 to 35 who said they did not have sex in the last year are more than double what they were a decade ago.
Other factors are also contributing to the decline in the number of sexually active people, the Institute for Family Studies (IFS) has found.
One of them could be the economic impact of the coronavirus and the higher unemployment rate.
But the presence of media, social networks or video games can also make sex less and less of a priority for young people.
"Since 2010, the proportion of 18-35-year-olds who say they did not have sex in the previous year has risen sharply," said IFS researcher Lyman Stone.
For people in marriage, sexual activity is more common, with only 5% saying they had not had sex in the last year.
For the free people, it was 29 percent. Stone added that marriage under 35 is only a small percentage.
The decrease in sexual activity is also due to the fear of premarital sex and religious affiliation.
While married men are more likely to be sexually active, the percentage of married and engaged men under 35 continues to decline.
Young people's attitudes to pre-marital sex are divided, with about 30% saying it's a bad thing, while about 70% think it's okay.
"It's true that within this age group there are minorities, but their behavior is moving that trend," Stone said of the 30 percent.
For most of those with a moral problem with premarital sex, the reason is religious upbringing.
Since 2008, among unmarried people under 35 who attend religious gatherings more than once a month, the abstinence rate has increased from 20 to almost 60 percent.
The trend has risen from 10 to 20 percent among the "less religious," Stone said.
Other factors contributing to the decline in sexual activity include less social interaction and, especially during the pandemic, less social drinking of alcohol.
The study also showed that the likelihood of having sex is lower for people who are unemployed or have lower incomes.
Another reason may be the proliferation of digital media, which apparently reduces the need for sex.
People are spending more time online, which is "replacing" this need.
This trend has taken hold especially during the lockdown of the coronavirus pandemic.
The mandate is about whether a company should force a portion of the population to do something they don't want to do, but which could save their life.
It's a pretty tough question, and one I'm personally most interested in the question of social conscience.
In other words, if we don't do it and they die, it will be our fault.
My argument is that we could certainly have done a better job explaining to an 80-year-old man who didn't really know what was going on, who heard some misinformation, and as a result didn't get vaccinated and ended up getting sick and dying.
On the other hand, I do not think that we can mourn the death of a staunch opponent of vaccination who has been working alongside the SPD and the KSČ for something about bullying and a totalitarian state.
From the statistics I mentioned, it is quite clear that the majority of pensioners who are not vaccinated are probably in the second group, so they will be able to take care of themselves.
No snow in the Czech Republic.
How a mild winter will affect the drought?
This winter has so far brought one of the smallest snowfalls in recent years to the Czech Republic.
Ski resort operators will not be able to do without technical snow, and the weather can also complicate preparations for the Jizerská padesátka cross-country skiing race.
Is it a trend or an exception?
And what will a lack of snow mean for the battle against drought in the Czech Republic?
I have one story, but it's not about a sandwich maker.
One day in middle school, our teacher took us across town to the marina so we could take a boat ride down the river.
On the way there we walked down a fairly wide street and we didn't see anyone in the middle of it - the devotees of the Hare Krishna sect.
Of course, they hit us.
I was lucky to escape, but one of my friends got into a conversation with him.
When she left, we asked her what she said to them.
"They asked me if I wanted to save my soul.
I told them I didn't have a soul," she said.
Everyone, including the teacher, laughed all the way to the dock.
We are so out of touch.
Nothing much is happening, but the system is breaking down, says Orozovič
The new German chancellor Olaf Scholz arrived in Warsaw on Sunday after previous visits to Paris and Brussels, where he was greeted by the prime minister, Mateusz Morawiecki, with military honors.
"We are opening a new chapter in our relations," Morawiecki said at a joint press conference after the meeting.
Scholz stressed that Europe must make it clear that it will not accept the violation of Ukraine's territorial integrity.
The crisis triggered by the disturbing movements of Russian troops near the Ukrainian border should be addressed through diplomatic efforts, including within the "Normandy" group, which includes France, Germany, Russia and Ukraine.
Morawiecki said the chancellor had been briefed on the situation at the Polish border with Belarus, where its leader, Alexander Lukashenko, has artificially created a migration crisis and uses people as human shields and weapons every night.
The chancellor and I discussed further sanctions to make it clear to the Lukashenko regime and its patrons in the Kremlin that we are determined to defend the eastern border of the EU.
According to the DPA news agency, Scholz assured that Warsaw is benefiting from German support in its dispute with Belarus, and condemned the inhumane treatment of Lukashenko's regime towards refugees.
Drunk Polish nun caused accident, tried to cover it up
The car returned to the scene of the accident after a while, but the driver was driven by another nun who tried to take the blame on herself.
When the police told her that she could still be fined for failing to give way and leaving the scene of an accident, she came clean to TVN24.
She admitted that she hit another nun who was asking for help.
The police then came for Sister Celestine.
She was breathalyzed and found to have over two per cent of alcohol in her system, so she was immediately taken off the road.
She was also informed that she would be held accountable for her actions in court.
Hugo is doing his best.
Juraj Šajmovič, however, did not overlook his film.
Czech filmmakers have looked to American stories about dog lovers for inspiration.
But they forgot the most important thing: the laws of film.
After the phenomenal success of Forrest Gump - the dog who taught people to live, another film, Here We Are Watching You, is now vying for viewers' emotions in cinemas.
The screenplay co-author and director Juraj Šajmovič Jr. continues the story of his 2012 film Tady hlídám já.
The talking tortoise Hugo returns to the stage, along with some familiar faces.
Julie and Ivan, the owners of a pension in Šumava that is going under, so they start calling in dog walkers, Julie's dad and his partner, and especially her daughter Veronika.
She is no longer a little girl, but a growing young woman who is experiencing her first love.
The director and his partner Beatriz Šajmovičová (who is also the film's producer) have been struggling with the story in their previous film, but at least the kids and the dog were having fun.
This time, the creative duo came up with a weaker script that evokes a mix of fear and feelings of dread.
Let's sum it up.
Julie, though a scientist, is overcome by the desire for a child, and when the right "constellation" appears, she copulates with her forest engineer Ivan, wherever the coordinates determine - on the car hood or the church tower (of course, during the ongoing excursion with a local guide), veteran colonel Mojmír shoots his own daughter (Julie), who falls into a coma, whereupon the family is taken to the hospital, so that the miracle of healing by dogs can take place in the heart of Bohemian solitude.
Nothing against the healing power of nature and the strength of animal love.
Their owners know why they have them.
The viewer gasps as to what a content pelmel full of dubious situations and figures was needed for this message.
A pair of staff thieves, a dog show judge, a charlatan from Šumava, police officers on the hunt for "drugs" and a discussion about the strength of bone marrow - and a drunken family in the guest house, of course.
When the heroine wakes up after a hard overdose and sits slumped at the family table with a cigarette in her mouth and demands her father's whisky and chips like a cured vegetarian, you can't help but laugh.
The creators also explain to the viewer that "this sometimes happens after a coma."
Šajmovič's team lacks basic dramaturgical knowledge of working with the text, the ability to build up the situations, the sense of the characters and the point, and the directing.
The acting is uneven, the editing is disjointed and the overall impression is muddled.
While Lukáš Vaculík, Jitka Ježková and Nela Boudová try to keep their parties afloat, they don't have much to work with.
The only flaw in the film is the poetic shots of the Šumava countryside taken by cameraman Vladimír Holomka and the pair of deer.
It is not enough to draw a few characters, a plot that is too thin, and dog-like vulgarities, let alone the more vulgar expressions used by the characters.
The argument is not that she is a member of the Pig Breeders' Club - as in the case of the producer.
With good intentions to promote nature and friendship with dogs, one must also have knowledge of the craft if one wants to tell a credible story.
In this case, it didn't.
There's a little too much smut and not enough respect for the genre.
Even as an infomercial for canister vacuums, this amateurish piece wouldn't pass muster.
Yes, respect, because they have to listen to constant abuse from people like you.
There is a difference between offering and coercing, and here you can see how you don't understand it, but that's only because you've never tried it.
The decision is always up to the customer, if they don't want it, the answer will always be no.
If you listened to such a kid, you might change your mind.
It's a job like any other, in this case a gig for extra cash.
The Middle East is experiencing unusually dry months.
It is the only time of the year when it rains.
"Almost complete absence of rainfall in November, as we have recorded at some stations, is unusual," the Israel Meteorological Service confirmed.
For example, Kfar Giladi, a village in northern Israel, reports only six percent of its long-term average rainfall in November.
The two-day rainfall this week was therefore more of an exception.
It's good for us.
It hasn't rained for a long time.
It's also the right Christmas spirit, said Nazareth resident Wasim Ashkar.
Rainfall in Israel comes almost exclusively in the winter months, are sudden and irregular.
The forests are dependent on the winter rains.
Without them, they dry out and are prone to fire.
It is not just the forests that are at risk, but also water supplies and irrigation for farmers.
Israel's largest freshwater source, the Sea of Galilee, is this year filled to the brim thanks to three consecutive rainy winters.
Since then, the tide has turned.
Water managers have been warning of the drought for years.
"It is expected that, as a result of global warming and climate change, precipitation will decrease," said Uri Schor, a spokesman for Israel's Water Authority, in 2018.
Israel is able to help with technologies such as desalination or wastewater recycling.
Economically weak countries like Lebanon, Syria and Jordan are worse off.
In the streets of the Jordanian capital, Amman, more cisterns are appearing.
Water mains and private wells are drying up.
"This year, orders have increased by 70-80 percent compared to the previous two years," Imád Sulejman, a tanker driver, said in September.
Clashes erupted between farmers and security forces in Isfahan, Iran.
The reason for the protests was the drought.
The river's channel was completely dry.
The region has had its driest November in many years.
Israel preparing military strike against Iran
Israel's defense minister said the Vienna talks did not bring "any progress" and that he had informed Washington of plans to attack Iran's nuclear facilities.
Defense Minister Benny Gantz announced on Saturday that he had ordered the Israeli army to prepare for a military strike against Iran, according to Jonathan Lis.
Gantz, who lives in the United States, is trying to persuade Americans to ratchet up the pressure on Iran, but has also informed Washington of military preparations.
At a press conference in Florida, Gantz said the Vienna talks had "not produced any progress" and the world powers "understand that Iran is playing with them."
This happened to me about three years ago.
I kind of teased her a little bit and grilled her during the interview to find out what she really wants from me.
In the end, I discovered that my suspicions about the pyramid were justified.
Because I really don't like these undertakers, I asked her a few more questions and doubts, and then thanked her and left.
Feel free to tell me I'm stupid, but pyramids are pyramids and financial advisers are financial advisers.
Skiers headed for the mountains over the weekend, plenty of snow and good weather
The ski resorts in the Czech Republic have experienced their first major influx of visitors this weekend.
After a heavy snowfall at the end of the working week, there is no shortage of snow and some ski resorts have already started operations.
The organisers have not deterred skiers from showing their Covid certificates at the lifts.
While skiers complain about the lack of customer interest, some ski rental businesses report weaker demand for their services than before the epidemic.
Thousands of people flocked to the cross-country skiing trails and downhill runs over the weekend in the Liberec region.
The skiers were blessed with the weather, which offered sunshine and good snow conditions.
"We are satisfied that the opening weekend really started from the Friday evening skiing, when we had the first skiers on the hill," said the manager of the Ještěd Sports Complex Jakub Hanuš.
Hundreds of people also headed to Jeseníky for the first weekend of skiing this season.
For example, the Ski Arena Karlov or the centre in Branná near Šumperk were opened.
The weekend attendance was very good, with about 400 people coming on Saturday and Sunday.
The conditions are not good.
Today, the sun shone, it was minus three degrees, so it was perfect, praised the representative of the ski resort in Branná, Rostislav Procházka.
Ski resort operators can only sell lift passes to people who are vaccinated or who have recovered from a Covid-19 infection.
People are ready for it and they are showing the necessary documents, said René Hroneš from the Špindlerův Mlýn sketch centre.
"We've only recorded incidents," he added.
Some ski rental shops and equipment shops are reporting lower interest than before the pandemic.
The interest in renting skis is fortunately high.
It's not like in previous years, but there are still customers, said Alexandra Bokišová from the Skiopava store in Opava.
Demand is expected to be higher during the period of ski courses.
The director of the Snowbear company in Hradec Králové, David Šinták, also feels that due to the coronavirus, there is not as much interest in renting ski equipment as there was before.
Before the pandemic, we were already almost on the verge of bankruptcy.
Compared to the pre-pandemic period, we are about 50 percent, Šinták told ČTK.
People have become lazy and learned to stay at home, according to him.
On the other hand, there is great demand at the Novako lending library in Božský Dar.
They started to lend out skis a week ago, and now people have to book them in advance.
"We start renting the chalets this weekend, but people have already been calling in advance, so we expect a lot of interest, just like last year," said the manager of the facility, Pavlína Novotná.
The interest is comparable to the pre-epidemic period, according to her.
If we want successful and wealthy people to stay, they must have the opportunity to live a good life here as they do abroad.
Socialist health care is not included, where it is often impossible to find a dentist or specialist doctor.
The country is losing its smart and savvy people who have no property here.
The owner of the company is not going to just leave the country.
But I completely agree with the rest.
If these people do not live well in the Czech Republic and if these people do not see a reasonable future in the Czech Republic, then they will not live in the Czech Republic.
The emigration from Hungary started when Orbán won one day, ruled for a year, and then the annual emigration rose by a few thousand.
It is naive to think that the Czech Republic cannot find itself in such a position on a daily basis.
Another question is whether the election is a choice.
If things go wrong here, then a traditional V4 lunatic could win.
The young and educated will leave, leaving behind his supporters and the people whose assets can't fit in a plane.
Awful photo!
Langmajer in blood over beer bet?
While autumn was in full swing in the Czech Republic, the film crew led by Jiří Langmajer (55) was enjoying tropical weather in Thailand!
The actor posted a bloody photo of his face on social media.
Is it a real injury or is it a make-believe injury for filming?
The London police are still looking for the missing Czech.
She was last seen on her way home.
"Petrina's disappearance is completely out of character and we are becoming increasingly concerned for her welfare," said Lucy O'Connor, a police officer in Lambeth, where Sorncova worked.
"Her family in the Czech Republic is also very worried about her and wants to know where she is," she continued.
The Czech woman, according to her, left work on Sunday, November 28, around 7:45 p.m. and headed home to Camberwell.
She was last seen about half an hour later on a bus.
She was reported missing on December 3 by one of her colleagues.
She was reported by British media to have worked as a "nursing assistant" at the Evelina London Children's Hospital, which is part of the Guy's and St Thomas' NHS Foundation Trust.
"We are extremely worried about our dear colleague Petra, who is missing," a group of medical facilities said in a Twitter post.
"We would urge anyone with any information to contact police," the statement continued.
The public is also being called upon to cooperate with Harriet Harman, the MP, who drew attention to the case at a press conference on Saturday.
"She's been missing for days, she's only 32, she's from the Czech Republic, her parents are understandably distraught," Labour MP said, holding a photograph of the woman distributed by London police.
"I feel we all have a very special responsibility to try and find her, because she was away from her home country, away from her family and working here for our health service," Ms Harman said.
Police have previously arrested one man in connection with the incident, who remains in custody.
However, according to the BBC, the police have not released any information about his identity or what he is suspected of.
Russia is not capable of occupying Ukraine, and certainly not with 30 BTG (ca 5 divisions).
I don't underestimate Ukraine either.
That's not "a lot," but about 8 percent of the Russian army.
Notice that Ukraine keeps saying that the threat of the invasion is exaggerated and that our entry is full of teeth.
I quoted above.
I don't know what he thinks Russia wants to do.
War is a costly hobby and Russia has the GDP of Italy.
The comparison with the situation in 38 is so many points that I don't know where to start.
I can compare it to the First Punic War and the "annexation" of Sicily:D
I can imagine that after Ukraine announced that it would not abide by the Minsk agreements, Russia would annex these ridiculous republics.
That is all there is to it, and that is what the "concentration" on the borders would correspond to.
Contracts are binding...
From Sunday, new traffic regulations will apply in Prague, mainly affecting commuter routes
Passengers using Prague's integrated transport (PID) system will see a number of changes from Sunday, which mainly affect local services.
New lines were created, some changed their route, and others disappeared.
Mladoboleslavsko is now joining the integrated system.
In the capital, from Sunday, the express trains from České Budějovice will stop at the Zahradní Město station.
S7 suburban trains will run on the route from Beroun to Český Brod, stopping at Prague main station.
The recently opened Prague-Zahradní Město station will now be served by the R17 express train from České Budějovice and Benešov.
PID will be expanded to other areas.
In addition, buses will run to Světlá nad Sázavou, Blatná near Jesenice, Staré Splavy and Turnov.
Buses will be added to the Mladoboleslav region, including lines extending into Liberec and Hradec Králové.
77 lines will be discontinued, 37 new ones will be introduced and the operation of 12 existing ones will be improved.
The new bus line 405 will depart from Prague's Zličín and will go all the way to Žatec.
There is also a new direct connection from Prague to Kralovice near Rakovník, which replaces the cancelled S53 train line.
The services will be strengthened in the morning peak and on weekends, when the new express line number 404 will start running.
The lines 400 and 410 going to Liberec are now included in the system.
They leave from Střížkov metro station, not Nádraží Holešovice.
Line 400 runs through Mělník, Dubá and Česká Lípa to Nové Bor and selected services continue to Rumburk or Cvikov.
The additional line 410 runs through Mělník, Dubá, Doksy, Mimoň and Jablonec nad Nisou.
On the other hand, the new operation has been cancelled or restricted on dozens of local routes in Central Bohemia, including to Mochov, Dobříš and Rožmitál pod Třemšínem.
All trains leaving Prague at 02:30 have been cancelled.
Long-term restrictions on the Prague - Beroun, Prague - Lysá nad Labem and in the vicinity of Kolín are still in place due to the modernisation of the railway.
Travellers will also see changes elsewhere.
Buses replace some of the cancelled railway lines or extend the line 420 from Dobříš with a connection to Prague, where PID tickets can be used up to Milevsko.
The routes of lines 540 to 543 in Nymburk have been changed, and the routes of some buses on the border of Central Bohemia and Hořovice in Plzeň region have been adjusted.
Healthy lunch/snack from supermarket to office
Hi, I work classic 9-5 with a 30min break and my only option to get food is to go next door to Billy or a short walk down to Lidl.
Since I don't move much, I don't have the energy to exercise, so I have to eat as healthily as possible.
Unfortunately, I never know what to buy and I end up buying a pizza and some yogurt and an apple in a hurry.
Question: What would you recommend I buy at the supermarket that I don't need to heat up?
Not everyone is waiting for a metre of snow like you are, unfortunately.
And it's not the trees you have to see.
Only the tip of the iceberg can be hidden under the snow.
If damaged, the tree can be more susceptible to fungal diseases.
I'm not saying that's the only reason we're banned from riding off-trail, but it's one of them.
Dara's confession about her relationship with Ned: I didn't enjoy it at all
The Czech show business pond has been buzzing since Friday with nothing but the revelation of the relationship between Dara Rolins and Pavel Nedved.
They have been dating since the summer, and the famous footballer even divorced his wife for the singer.
Dara has now sent a lengthy message to fans explaining why she kept her love life a secret for so long.
"I can say that there is no one in the Czech Republic or Slovakia who wouldn't know that Dara caught a bear, sorry, a moose," Dara Rolins, who is in love with the most successful Czech footballer, jokes.
However, he allegedly wrapped it up, not the other way around.
Three days are in the spotlight, and although they are used to it, they do not enjoy it.
And it is here.
What we both didn't want to do but knew would eventually happen, continued the singer.
I just don't know who's worse off.
If you don't care and jump on them, or we, whose lives are being picked apart in great detail.
Like if someone wanted to hear your opinion on whether or not you get along with your husband or girlfriend, or you insisted that everyone really get to know a list of all your exes and be familiar with the list of your mistakes and mistakes.
That's what you want, isn't it, Dara?
The couple reunited in Italy, where Rollins was going to work on her new fashion collection.
Nedvěd has also been a vice president of the Juventus football club for a long time.
They've been waiting for Ned's divorce to be finalized.
They have been separated for three years, but they are only three weeks into their paperless marriage.
Thank you to those who are celebrating with us and wishing us well.
We're just people, we have families, children, pasts and dreams.
We're not perfect, but I think we both have our hearts in the right place.
That's why I love my new man and just like him, I stand by him in good times and bad.
Hey, everyone else has already said most of what needs to be said, I'm just confirming that the dorms are super nice at the beginning, my classmates mostly got to know each other during their first semester or two and found roommates together, which I think is the best option, because you know who you'll be living with.
Apartments are usually listed for a long time in advance, so you probably won't find anything right now, but it's worth checking out the listings just to see what's out there.
Otherwise, you should definitely avoid Cejl and the surroundings (streets like Vranovská, Francouzská, etc., that's a pretty bad address), and some parts of Žižkov are a bit of a ghetto.
On the other hand, the Veveří quarter is very student-friendly, Kralovo Pole and in that direction it's nice, but it's also close to most of the VUT faculties (I don't know where exactly you're going).
I have never been a lodger, but I am a native of Brno, so I can advise you on Brno as such, if you need any further information.
But that's just a "normal" way of thinking.
Because of what some doctors decided to do somewhere in Poland, it is actually okay that the state does not sufficiently fund some schools.
Either they learn what they want and pay for it themselves, or they go by the state and pay the state.
We cannot allow a private operator to take over a piece of education just because he adds a few crowns to the full state contribution, and as a result will be able to teach what he wants in the schools.
Such a statement loses some of its weight when written by someone who, two days earlier, had this to say about a petition calling for a boycott of the totalitarian state:
So, a vote against whether someone should have an abortion is the same as a vote against whether a statue should be put up in the square?
I would talk to the person who gave you the job directly about it.
Otherwise, I've seen in cataloging/digitization that (and even long-time professionals) either miss it, or write something like xxx *** or ... (by convention) and note that it's illegible.
The truth is, in this case it's quite readable, so I wouldn't really recommend it.
I would probably deal with it in a note depending on what program you're using.
If you want to be a good and studious student, you can look up some sign language databases and find the nearest one.
But since it looks like you're drawing from a book, I'd guess the author or printer simply created their own mark that fits what's physically on the coin.
PS: It's not a coincidence that it's called OdryNska, but OdryNska?
PSS: Someone has already spilled the beans on this.
Ignore the comment about PHILH
Politicians don't know what the "theme" of our presidency will be.
That's a lot worse than having interpreters.
The idea that they would approve something because nobody understood the text is laughable.
All important approved documents are examined word for word, and some basic knowledge of English is not enough, this is the job of lawyers.
Hundreds of translators and interpreters work in the EU's various institutions, and English is more suited to politicians for informal contacts, for forging extra-standard relationships.
And with the English, it's quite interesting post-Brexit.
I don't get the hate for the Cylons.
I've been there for three years now and I'm very happy.
How many times do I leave work at 10pm and never have a problem.
That it is a ghetto can only be said by someone who has not walked through it in their life.
Yes, most of the Roma population of Brno lives there, but the only thing they do is block the sidewalks and park where they're not supposed to. It's not like I'd be afraid to go out at night and climb up the street.
So if you're looking for relatively cheap accommodation with good access to the centre, then I'd be happy to recommend it.
There are now plenty of newly renovated or newly built apartments.
Felix Slováček (78) without Dada and girlfriend Gelemová as a nail in the coffin!
Who will he spend Christmas with?
Most people lit the first candle on their advent wreath on Sunday, Felix Slováček didn't.
I don't have an advent wreath, so there was nothing to light.
I've seen the wreath and Lucie must have one too, said the saxophonist, who confirmed Patras's words that he often visits her.
He visits but does not live in their house in Vinohrady, where Dada stayed after he left.
The Slovak still doesn't know where he will be on Christmas Eve.
Recently we met with Anicka, Felix and both boys.
VIDEO: Felix Slováček and Lucie Gelemová: TOGETHER AGAIN!
Felix Slováček and Lucie Gelemová: TOGETHER AGAIN!
But we still talked, so Christmas didn't happen.
I really don't know where I'm going.
I buy gifts all the time, and I'll definitely get Dad and Lucy something, maybe a perfume.
I'm a gentleman, added Felix, who himself came to the baptism of the music video in the Richman club.
I'm here alone, but I don't feel alone.
He always finds someone to have fun with, says the Slovak, who was happy to meet the wife of Luděk Sobota, Adrian, or singer Kamila Nývlt.
And he was very clear about it.
And we are Iceland, so we can afford to have no army and no weapons?
I doubt anyone would defend us and our location is so strategically important that the aggressor would have to be a complete idiot not to occupy the territory.
And I don't understand why that would be a bad argument, so can you explain that to me?
I'm not aware of any other component that could be deployed in hospitals.
There are not enough police and they can't afford it, so firefighters and nowhere else have such a high percentage of medically trained people at that level.
And the fact that our army is capable of defending Ostrava is going to go to the heads of previous governments, not the army, which has been asking for new toys for a long time.
Record drought in the Czech Republic.
It is necessary to change agricultural subsidies, the countryside is not just a food factory, says the journalist.
The Czech Republic is going through the worst drought in recent years.
Scientists say water levels have dropped in mountainous and foothill areas, and even in places where drought has not been a problem.
The drought that is affecting large parts of Central Europe is caused by climate change.
But the impact is also magnified by the way we manage the land.
What should be done in connection with the drought?
And how can we help nature in difficult times?
It will be like that, I can barely skate on the ice, mushrooms I don't know what to play, and the tactics (what I tried in Franchise Hockey Manager) are also all over the place.
And whether you're the "bear of Russia" or the "lamb of China," losing by two goals even when you don't have to win is different from being tied.
But as I listen to the Czech commentators who are pointing out what the referees see or don't see, whether it's men's or women's hockey, it's all weird, but it's like all sports, UEFA and "Italian actors" or motorsport F1, WRC, etc.
The controversy is everywhere.
And if it was the other way around, it would be like always, and that Czech has been losing to Russia more than winning, maybe it would be a classic "they lost" vs "we won".
Coronavirus: Russia's cases exceed 10 million
On Saturday 11 December, the Czech Republic recorded 9080 daily cases.
5766 people have been hospitalized.
A total of 34,451 people died in the Czech Republic, and another 74.
The number of confirmed cases in the Czech Republic in the last 14 days is 1,967 per 100,000, and 871 per 100,000 in the last week.
The number of cases in Russia on Sunday exceeded 10 million.
In the last 24 hours, 29,929 new cases have been registered.
It is the lowest daily figure since October 13.
The total number of registered cases of infection in Russia is 10,016,896.
The daily death toll is 1,132, the lowest since late October.
Britain is facing an "inevitable" surge in cases caused by the Omicron variant, said Dr Susan Hopkins, chief medical adviser to the UK Health Security Agency, on Sunday on television.
New quarantine measures will be required.
People infected with Omicron are already being admitted to hospital in Britain, and Hopkins expects the number to rise.
So far, no one has died from omicron, but hospitalizations are occurring about 14 days after infection and deaths about three weeks after infection.
Labour leader Keir Starmer said on Sunday that Boris Johnson may have broken the law by holding a Christmas quiz at Downing Street last December when the lockdown was in place and Christmas parties were banned.
One minister in Johnson's government defended the quiz as "virtually" taking place online through a computer.
But they were joined by staff gathered around computers in Downing Street.
Pressure is mounting on Prime Minister Johnson to resign in Britain.
Last December, when a strict lockdown was imposed in London and Christmas parties were banned, Johnson's ministers held numerous parties despite the lockdown.
The British public and media are furious that Johnson and his government have made a mockery of them:
Paul Brand, editor of ITV's commercial television channel for Britain: Two years ago today, Boris Johnson won a landslide victory in the general election.
This morning, the Conservative Party is talking about removing him from the post of Prime Minister.
Remarkable how quickly the events unfolded.
Do you want to turn and save your skin?
Hungary is due to hold elections in the spring that could end 12 years of Viktor Orban's rule.
They will be major European elections.
How fair can they be?
They won't be fair.
They will probably not be free either, because they were not even the last two elections under Orbán.
Its party, Fidesz, controls the media, changes electoral districts to benefit itself, and plays other small or large tricks.
The last one sounds like everyone can choose where to vote in practice.
This will allow Fidesz to move voters from certain districts to those where the outcome is uncertain and the opposition could win.
So I'm just saying, they won't be.
Do you think it will be as nefarious as in 2014 and 2018?
After all, the situation is very different.
It used to be whether Fidesz would win, but how much and whether it would have a constitutional majority.
Now there is a real chance that more voices and seats will be gained by the united opposition.
This is a big surprise for Viktor Orbán and his party.
Will they try even harder to hold on to power?
Yes, we have some indications that they are prepared to go beyond what they have done in the past.
Recently, a recording of the Speaker of Parliament and one of the leaders of Fidesz, László Kövér, leaked to the independent media, in which he tells intelligence chiefs that the opposition is a threat to national security.
Those are the hints of a new approach you're talking about?
Yes, that's one of the new things.
It all starts with language.
I've been bit a lot, the last time was when I was 14, my parents aren't very patient, neither am I, my dad has had it for a long time, but then it explodes (only in relation to me).
I was also very temperamental and I was very angry as a little girl, to the point where I would turn blue and they would have to take me under the shower a couple of times to calm me down.
Sometimes they would chastise me, sometimes it was more like they didn't know what to do with me.
I definitely have a tendency to solve things with violence, as a kid I used to fight a lot, now I'll smash something just to smash something, as a younger person I'd maybe smack my parents across the hand (to get them to stop) so never anything extreme, but always the urge.
I'm not sure how much of that is my own explosive nature, but I'm sure the upbringing has a lot to do with it.
I'm afraid I'll lose my patience with my own children and deal with it the same way.
I think hitting kids is just wrong and my parents shouldn't have done it, especially not at a time when it wasn't "educational," but out of frustration, on the other hand, every parent makes mistakes, so I don't blame them.
It doesn't bother me, I don't understand why the OP should be embarrassed.
Laws should be clear and unambiguous.
I would call those who make laws in such a quality.
Otherwise, I'd be interested to know if you're worried about a revenue shortfall?
Can you really count on people wanting and buying your product and you having enough to pay your mortgage?
Kočner's outrageous world.
Where will Slovakia move the trial of the murder of journalist Kuciak?
The main trial in the case of the murder of Ján Kuciak and Martina Kušnírová begins in Slovakia.
The death of the investigative reporter and his partner changed Slovakia.
It was a civil society group, but it also exposed the practices of businessman Marián Kočner and his connections to the top of Slovak politics and justice.
What will a major change mean for Slovakia?
Journalists can make a lot of money out of this.
How is it possible that this petition got far more media attention than the petition by the deans of all the medical schools, which came out the next day, two days later?
Well, they got sick and the company got away with it.
The Czech television has been reporting on Covid-19 for six months already.
Another government ends and the law on municipal involvement in the selection of a landfill is nowhere to be found
Minister Karel Havlíček's draft needs to be fundamentally revised
The government of Prime Minister Andrej Babiš is coming to an end, and the law that was supposed to ensure the interests of municipalities and their citizens in the selection and licensing of a deep-level repository for high-level radioactive waste is still not in place.
The government's legislative council has suspended consideration of a bill that the ministry of industry and trade submitted to the government after years of debate.
However, its content is in serious conflict not only with the municipalities involved in the Platform Against Deep Storage, but also with the Czech Union of Municipalities and Towns.
The self-governments are expecting a significant strengthening of their options for deciding on the repository, which has been promised to the mayors since 2011, when the first work on this legislation began and which the Czech atomic law and the European directive require.
We expect the new government to revise the proposal in line with its coalition agreement in cooperation with municipalities.
The draft law proposed by Minister Karel Havlíček, which the Platform has access to, is criticized by municipalities in particular: The proposed level of involvement of municipalities and the public in the decision-making process regarding the selection of a site for a repository is inadequate and cannot ensure respect for the interests of municipalities and their citizens.
It can only be truly effective if the municipalities or the public can influence whether the process will continue in a particular location.
This can be ensured by requiring the Depositary to request the consent of the affected municipalities before starting a specific procedure.
The draft proposal almost completely ignores public involvement and turns citizens into little more than statistics in permitting decisions.
The proposal lacks the system setting of compensation for municipalities for the whole process of searching and selecting a site for a repository, its permitting and operation.
Local authority representatives do not have many options when it comes to defending the interests of their citizens when looking for a site for a waste facility.
Only in certain permits can comments or appeals be made, but the decision is made by the authority or the minister in whose interest the permit is issued.
Any appeal does not have a suspensive effect on the implementation of exploration or construction works.
The co-decision of the local authorities that the Platform is calling for is a principle that is commonly used in many democratic countries and certainly in those that have already made progress in allowing storage, such as Sweden and Finland.
The drafting of the law is another failure of the state administration, which hires external law firms to draft legislation.
In this case, it is a contract with the law firm HAVEL & PARTNERS s.r.o. that SÚRAO has entered into, and it follows the contract with attorney Jan Zemánek.
The total sum for these works is estimated to be around CZK 4 million, according to the register of contracts.
Antonín Seknička, the deputy mayor of the village of Cejle from the Hrádek locality and the spokesman for the Platform Against Deep Repository said: After the ministers of industry who passed the responsibility for finding a deep repository for high-level radioactive waste on to their successors, we expect a more significant change from the new government.
We are also offering assistance.
We would also like to thank the Association of Municipalities and Towns, which views the problem of insufficient rights for municipalities in relation to such a fundamental building in the same way as the directly affected municipalities in the selected locations.
The Deep Geological Repository Platform brings together 51 members (35 municipalities and cities and 16 associations) to promote a change in the state's approach to dealing with spent nuclear fuel and other radioactive waste, which will not be limited to deep geological repositories.
The platform also calls for the decision on the site for possible storage to be subject to the prior consent of the affected municipalities.
John Goodman's (69) fear of gaining weight forced him to shed 90 pounds.
While he didn't need to change his lifestyle for a long time, eventually doctors scared him.
They told him if he didn't lose weight, he would die.
And that's what happened.
The Sun reports that Goodman has lost 90 kilograms, or half his original weight of 180 kg.
He showed off his new character at the premiere of the animated series The Freak Brothers in Los Angeles.
The guy from the Roseanne sitcom is a completely different person!
John liked to joke that his friends and family begged him to lose weight because his large body was causing furniture to break.
"I just shoved it all in my mouth," the actor said in a 2018 interview with AARP.
This time I wanted to do it slowly.
To move, to exercise.
I'm getting to the age where I can't afford to sit still, said ABC's Goodman, whose transformation is amazing.
It also depends on the boss you're talking about and the context in which you're using the word "boss."
If it's a text on a platform that expects a gamer audience, I wouldn't translate it.
If it was a formal text or perhaps a university text, I would probably look for a way to describe or explain the boss.
There are more kinds of bosses.
For example, a game like Dark Souls has multiple bosses, yes, and so the "boss" is kind of like a lord or ruler of a level, and then there's a final boss...
Many games have hidden bosses (super boss, hidden boss) that are not required to be fought to complete the game or level, but are often stronger than the standard boss.
Then there are games like Half-Life, where the bosses are there, but you don't actually fight them (Tentacle, Gargantua), and how should we call them?
And then there are the mini-bosses.
It's a one-word translation of the boss that's just about impossible to find, and other languages don't solve the problem either (interestingly, Catalan, which translates the boss as the final opponent).
It's basically a story or game in general, computer-controlled, more powerful than all the previous ones and watching the completion of some level or task.
The world is on the hunt for missing Londoner Petre.
The Czech police were also involved.
British police have been searching for missing Petra Srncova since December 3.
The Czech police are also involved in the search.
The 32-year-old woman from Uherskohradišťsko has been missing since December 7.
Interpol also helps the British police.
Ms. Srncová was last seen by colleagues on November 28.
British police have been searching for her since December 3.
Interpol issued a so-called yellow notice for her.
Peter is being sought by the whole world.
"The Czech police cooperate closely with the British police," confirmed police spokeswoman Kateřina Rendlová.
"We are sharing information on the case," she added.
The search for Petre has also been featured on the police website.
He says she is 168 centimetres tall, is skinny, has brown eyes and long, straight brown hair of the same colour.
She should be from Uherskohradišťsko.
Petra worked as a nurse in one of London's hospitals.
Her friends and colleagues are worried about her disappearance, as it is so unusual for her to go missing
Ms Harman has also been involved in the search for Mr Petre.
She was involved in the distribution of flyers with Petra's face on them.
"We are very concerned about her," she said at a press conference on Saturday.
In connection with the disappearance, British police have already arrested one suspect.
However, it is not clear who he is talking about and what he has in common with Petra.
Pre-Christmas Czech terrifies Agent Tesla.
While data in October showed a slight decline in offensive operations, last month's surge in attacks was marked by the approaching end of the year.
We recorded a big campaign for Agent Tesla on November 18.
The attacks are aimed at the Czech Republic.
The attackers' strategy remains the same.
The infected attachment in the email will catch the user's attention with a name that refers to payments and financial transactions.
Last month, the dangerous attachment had the word "invoice" in its name, but this time it was marked as "Copy of Invoice Correction for 11.2021...exe," said Martin Jirkal from Eset.
Spyware contains functions that scan Internet browsers and other programs, such as Microsoft Outlook email clients, Mozilla Thunderbird or Yandex.
The malicious code actively seeks out stored login credentials and then sends them to the attackers.
The last major campaign took place in the Czech Republic at the end of August and beginning of September, and with the approaching holidays and the end of the year, the attackers' activity is once again on the rise.
In November, the spyware Formbook was still active.
Unlike Agent Tesla, the attackers in this case are not targeting the Czech Republic specifically, and security specialists in November detected campaigns with a more global reach.
Compared to the October Formbook, it's slightly down, but it's still more than a fifth of all detections.
Attacks continued throughout the month with increased activity on 3, 10 and 15 November.
The Formbook usually contained an .exe attachment called REQUEST FOR SPECIFICATION.
The invoice's name is also still appearing.
The annex in Czech may be far more dangerous for the Czech user.
Security analysts have noted a significant drop in activity for the Fareit program, which accounted for 1.6 percent of attacks and has not mounted a major offensive campaign in the Czech Republic in several months.
Today's smart-arse, who doesn't need oxygen because oxygen is for the vaccinated idiots.
The Prague parade was bigger than the media reported.
From the footage of the march along the waterfront and my own experience as a protester, I would guess around 10,000 people.
People in the procession filled the banks and the bridge and the opposite bank of the river.
That means a lot of people.
The march of about 4,000 demonstrators is joined by an unprecedented number of bystanders.
I claim that something new is being born here, writes Radek Mokrý.
That the sustained discontent of several large groups or strata of the population led to the emergence of a common language.
Just the antivaxxers, anti-roushers and the like would not have been able to pull off or pay for such a parade.
The actions of the Society for the Prevention of Cruelty to Animals are becoming more and more popular, reminding me of Million Minutes for Democracy.
Sometimes I get the impression that they rent the same stage and equipment.
It is hard to say what movement would emerge from this discontent, not only because of the money, but also because of whether the three-dose vaccine from Pfizer becomes a four-dose vaccine.
It won't be a leftist or centrist movement, you can bet on that.
A three-dose vaccine will almost certainly become a multi-dose vaccine, because it is clear that we will have to be re-vaccinated every six months.
I'm very glad that the vaccines saved us.
A noble act of mankind that we should all be proud of.
End of a plateau, Bulgaria has a new prime minister promising change
Bulgarian President Rumen Radev has tasked the formation of a new government to Kirill Petkov, leader of the anti-corruption movement We Continue the Change, which won the November elections.
It has managed to put together a broad coalition government that should take office in a matter of days.
The political crisis in the country has been ongoing since April, when the previous government lost elections in the face of anti-corruption protests.
But the winning parties, pledging to fight corruption and abuse of power, failed to reach an agreement, leading to two more early elections.
What do cats do when nobody's watching?
From the "secret" footage, it's a global hit.
Concerns have grown in Britain over the fate of the 32-year-old Czech woman who has been missing for several days.
Petra Srncová was last seen two weeks ago as she drove home from work in the British capital.
Police are also appealing to her former employer and the MP for the London constituency where she lived.
"Petrina's disappearance is completely out of character and we are becoming increasingly concerned for her welfare," said Lucy O'Connor, a police officer in Lambeth, where Sorncova worked.
"Her family in the Czech Republic is also very worried about her and wants to know where she is," she continued.
The Czech woman was reported missing on Sunday, November 28, around 7:45 p.m. She left work and headed home to the Camberwell area.
She was last seen about half an hour later on a bus.
She was reported missing on December 3 by a co-worker.
She was reported by British media to have worked as a "nursing assistant" at the Evelina London Children's Hospital, which is part of the Guy's and St Thomas' NHS Foundation Trust.
"We are extremely worried about our dear colleague Petra, who is missing," a group of medical facilities said in a Twitter post.
"We would urge anyone with any information to contact police," the statement continued.
An anonymous person has accused the amateur children's room painter Zdeňka Dvořáková Kocourková (also a county pirate councillor) of infringing copyright with her paintings.
However, the court ruled that Krtečka's paintings in the Šumperk rooms did not violate the law.
In Ústí nad Labem, a month-long hole in the road was caused by a channel without a lid.
It was life.
The magistrate referred the complaints to the RDS, which is responsible for the road, and because it didn't respond, the hole got bigger.
In the end, the authorities clarified responsibilities and ownership, and after a month, the Ministry of the Interior "intensively dealt with the situation."
